Resolution Engine
Any entity capable of taking actions in Eternity Ascendant has multiple abilities, grouped into several pairs. For an ordinary human or similar character, the assumed default is Physical, Social, Mental, and Endurance groups. Organizations or more exotic characters may have different or additional groups.

Any time a roll is called for, either as part of an Action or as a Reaction supporting, opposing, or mitigating an Action, the player chooses two groups. The Primary group is always dependent on what is being attempted: 
Physical for movement, combat, etc. 
Mental for comprehension, invention, deduction, etc.
Social for debate, argument, intimidation, etc. 
Endurance (and equivalent Plot Armor-determining groups for nonstandard characters and organizations) cannot be Primary.

In addition to the Primary group, the player also chooses a Supporting group defining how their character is attempting to perform the action. For example:
Using brute force or extreme precision in solving a puzzle would be Physically aiding a Mental action. 
Using facts and logical argument in a debate would be a Mental assist to a Social action. 
Feints and manipulation in a swordfight would be a Social Support to a Physical action. 
Attempting to triumph through raw persistence would be an Endurance Supporting.
Dice
When rolling, the player rolls a number of 6-sided dice equal to the Action ability from the Primary group for that roll. Any result of 4 or higher is a success, and on a roll of 6, the attempt also gains Fortune.
Adding Dice
Spending Power
By spending Power from the roll, extra dice can be purchased one-for-one, up to a total of both Abilities combined.
Spending Effort
Dice can be purchased with Effort at a two-for-one rate, up to a total of both Abilities combined, including with the above.
External Bonuses
Prepare Actions, Gear, Supporting Reactions, Chaining, and so on can apply extra Dice, up to a combined total from all sources of double the above limit.
Spending Dice
All of the following options can be taken multiple times.
Guaranteeing Dice
By spending two dice, the player can add a Success to the final roll, maximum 4.
Increasing Tier
By spending 8 dice, the Tier of an Action may be increased by 1, before rolling.
Talents/Traits
A character’s Talents or the Traits of an Asset or Challenge involved may allow or require the player to spend Dice in exchange for some other effect.
Dice Limits
Recap:
For the Action being rolled, the player chooses a Primary and a Supporting Ability group. 
The Action starts with the Primary Action Ability’s rating in dice.
An additional amount, up to the Supporting Action Ability’s rating, can be gained from spending Power from the roll or Effort from the character, for a total number of dice equal to both Abilities combined.
Outside sources may add extra Dice until the total number of dice is equal to double the above total, including dice that are being spent.

No attempt may physically roll more than ten dice. If an attempt has more than ten unspent dice when rolling, the extras are lost to no effect.
Difficulty
The difficulty of a roll is the number of successes required for the attempt to have any effect. This is 1, unless stated otherwise. Each success above the Difficulty grants 1 additional Power.
Fortune
A die that naturally rolls a 6 gives the attempt 1 additional Power. This Power does not count against the normal caps, and may be spent on any normal effect at any time, even if they would normally have to be declared before rolling, such as rolling additional dice or guaranteeing successes by turning failed dice into successes.
Power
The actual effect of a roll, in terms of damage dealt, progress against challenges, etc. is measured in Power. An attempt starts with an amount of Power equal to the Effort ability of its Primary group before accounting for bonuses or penalties.

Additional Power may be gained through Talents, spending resources, Chaining, being Supported by allied Reactions, prior Prepare Actions, excess successes or Fortune from dice, or other effects. Once total Power is increased higher than the total Effort Abilities chosen for the roll, any additional Power is halved, rounded down. Total Power after halving cannot be greater than double the combined Abilities, above. Fortune does not apply to these limits.

If penalties or mitigation from Reacting characters, passive defenses, or Resilience of challenges result in Power being reduced to 0, the Action fails and has no effect.
Spending Power
Power may be spent to improve the dice roll, or buy additional effects for a successful attempt that aren’t direct progress on the objective.
Extra Dice
Before rolling, pay 1 per die, as above.
Conditions
After rolling, the player may choose to trade Power for a lasting benefit to themselves or an ally, or a negative effect on an opponent or challenge. The cost of this varies with the strength of the Condition.
Tier
After rolling, the player may choose to trade 8 Power to increase the Tier of the roll.
Tier
The Tier of a roll relates to the scale of the Action it is part of, how large and significant of a challenge or opponent it is capable of meaningfully affecting, and the duration of its effects.

Long-term Projects and Crises, large-scale Obstacles, and powerful opponents need Actions of a certain Tier or higher in order to be affected at all, and if an Action is opposed by a Reaction of higher Tier, it automatically fails as if it rolled 0 successes and had 0 Power.
Spending Tiers
If an Action has a higher Tier than is required to succeed, the surplus Tiers can be spent on additional powerful effects. If multiple Tiers are being spent, no single effect can account for more than half of the spent Tiers, rounded down.
Raising Damage
If an attack would deal damage to one of a target’s PA tracks, instead deal damage to a higher track (APA → SPA → NPA). If it would already damage their highest track, they are defeated instantly.
Negate Difficulty
Set the Difficulty of an Action to 0, including the effects of any opposing Reactions. 
Negate Resistance
Remove any penalties to Power from an Action, including the inherent Resistance of a Challenge, or any opposing Reactions.
Multitasking
The same roll can also be applied to an additional Action for no AP cost. Spending additional Tiers adds even more extra Actions.
Area
If the Action has targets or affects an area, increase the size of that area, increasing from Single Target → Engagement → Entire Zone → Adjacent Zones → Entire Scene

Increasing above Full Scene may have narrative-scale effects, but will not immediately impact the scene.
Goal Reinforcement
The player may choose to increase the amount of Impact committed to a Goal within the Scene by 1, either as Investment or Bonus.
Negate Spillover
High-Tier Actions have Spillover effects, below. Each Tier spent on this Bonus reduces the effective Tier of the Action by 2 when determining Spillover effects. The normal limit on purchasing Bonuses does not apply, but the effective Tier cannot be reduced below 0.
Raising Tiers
An Action’s Tier can be raised before rolling by Major Talents, Ascended Abilities, or outside assistance applied for the Action, or after rolling by spending 4 Successes, 8 Power, an Ascension Token, or using high-Tier Gear.
Granted Bonuses
Some effects, such as the Lethal trait on attacks, give the effects of a spent Tier directly. These do not count as Tier increases for the purposes of Spillover or the Success threshold for an Action, but they do count for purchasing effects. For example, a Lethal attack already has the “Raise Damage” bonus. To apply it a second time, the Action would have to be raised three Tiers, for a total of four “spent tiers”.
If an Action has multiple such bonuses, they each count towards this total, thus a Lethal Area Attack would only need two more Tiers before another could be spent on raising damage.

If these are expended simply meeting the minimum Tier for the Action, as Lethal might be to reach an appropriate Tier for damaging a tough opponent, the above does not apply.
Spillover
High-Tier Actions are massively powerful, and rarely clean of any side effects or collateral damage. To represent this, apply a second, related Action with the same roll to either the surrounding environment or nearby characters, spending as many Tiers (min. 1) on Area as needed to appropriately represent the consequences.

This is not necessarily harmful to the player’s intent, and it should fall to the acting Player to declare the form it takes. For example, it is perfectly reasonable to suggest that enemy Minions got caught in the middle of a barrage against a more powerful adversary. However, as with all things, narrative consequence should reign supreme, and Players deliberately choosing negative (or at least heavily complicating) side effects should be rewarded with Ascension Tokens.
Compromised Success
If an Action fails to succeed, lacks enough power to overcome Resistance and have any effect, or has insufficient Tier, the player may choose to succeed at a significant price instead of outright failing. The consequences should be agreed upon with the rest of the player group and be worked into the circumstances of the Scene. As a rule of thumb, spend the amount of Power required to guarantee the missing successes, and shortfall in Tier, then combine that cost with any shortfall in Power and double the total. Apply this result as Conditions or unmitigated damage to the character, representing extreme measures the character was forced to resort to, or bad luck on their part. 

For example, a character attempting to hide may have found the only viable “cover” was out of the window… of the third floor. Or, when jumping to clear a gap, come short and have to free a hand to catch themselves, dropping equipment and becoming Disarmed.
Scene Resolution
In the Narrative Scope, a player starting the Scene describes (within reason) the circumstances of the Scene, defines a Primary Ability Group for the Scene overall, and then chooses the Supporting group that they specifically will use for the Scene. The combination of these groups gives the player Agency and Impact with which to define their Goals for the Scene in the same way these groups define Dice and Power for Actions. 

The player describes a number of Goals their character intends to accomplish during the Scene, up to a maximum equal to their total Agency, then may distribute both Agency and Impact across those Goals. If the player chose an Ascended Ability to use when starting the Scene, increase the Tier of the Goal by 1 for each such Ability. The final amount of Agency invested corresponds to both the effectiveness of the Goal once completed, and the Difficulty of the Challenge required to complete it. Likewise, the Impact invested determines the effectiveness of the completed Goal, and the Resistance of the Challenge required to complete it. All Goals should have at least 1 Agency and 1 Impact invested, and they are not required to spend all available Agency/Impact. Different goals may amount to the same effect (ex. Destroy the East, South, and West barracks all fundamentally translate to “Attack army”) but should still be distinct. 

Once the Goals have been set, the player may choose to spend any remaining Impact or Agency to gain bonuses to completing a given Goal, in the form of Gear, Preparations, or other Talent-enabled effects.

Once the acting player has established the Scene, other characters may choose to React, inserting themselves into the Scene. They may choose their own personal Goals, or focus on aiding the existing ones, adding Agency and Impact to them. If any Goal ends up with more than 5 Agency/10 Impact, instead reduce the effective Agency/Impact by 4/8 and raise the Tier of the Goal by 1.

A Reacting character joining to oppose does not subtract from an existing Goal; instead, they may declare a new Goal that mitigates the consequences of the existing one, ex. Evacuating a camp before its destruction. Once the Scene has started, of course, they are free to more directly oppose the completion of the original Goal.

At the end of the Scene, discard all Goals that were not successfully achieved, and then separate them by their intended target Adversary, Challenge, or Project (ex. “Attack army” vs. “Train a combat Talent”), then total the Agency and Impact invested among all completed Goals in each group. If not all Goals are in the same Tier, divide them by Tier and total within each Tier. 4 Agency or 8 Impact may be deducted from any group to raise the Tier. If this raises all groups to the same Tier, combine and continue totaling.If this cannot be done, total only the highest-tier Goals made against any particular Adversary, Challenge, or Project, and discard all others.

Apply those totals towards any Narrative-level Projects or Adversaries as equivalent to the Successes and Power of an Action 2 Tiers higher than the Goal. 
Narrative
The Narrative is the largest time structure within the bounds of the rules presented and each most likely lasts for multiple sessions. It is a vehicle for the most persistent consequences and effects and a structure for Players to create scenes in.
Plot Armor
A character’s Narrative PA is their most important PA track and the one that recovers slowest, only recovering upon completion of the Narrative. A character whose Narrative PA is exhausted is defeated, and can no longer impact the story. Death is a possibility, but they may simply be imprisoned, humiliated, exiled, bankrupt, or otherwise lacking whatever power base they had that made them capable of affecting the story. Usually represents serious injury or severe damage to whatever power base makes them effective at the character’s current Tier, ex. The treasure fleet of a merchant prince.

Scene Plot Armor recovers multiple times within each narrative episode, and is damaged relatively often, usually representing exhaustion, spent resources, or repairable but significant damage to health or operation. If a character’s Scene PA is exhausted, they take a point of Narrative PA and fully refill their Scene track. If whatever reduced their Scene PA still has damage left to inflict, this now continues on the refilled track.
Rounds
At the start of each round within the Narrative scope, each character chooses any two of their Ability Groups (Physical, Mental, Social, Endurance). For the two selected, take the Action Ability (DEX, INT, MNP, LCK) from each pair. The higher of these two is the amount of starting Spotlight the character has for instigating or joining scenes. They may at any later time Exert themselves for additional Spotlight, taking damage to their Scene PA point-for-point, up to a Spotlight total equal to both of the above abilities combined.

This is then repeated with the Effort half of the above pairs (STR, LRN, CHA, WILL) to get the character’s starting and maximum Resources for the turn.
Priority
After characters have recovered their Spotlight, they may spend it on Priority point-for-point to determine the turn order within the round. Any Spotlight spent on this count towards the character’s  maximum Spotlight they can spend during their turn. Characters take their turn in descending order of Priority, starting with the highest.
Turn
On a character’s turn, they can declare the start of a Scene, explaining (within reason) the circumstances, purpose, and target(s), if any.

In addition to this free scene, they may also spend 2 Spotlight to start an additional scene at any later point until the end of the round, up to a total amount of Spotlight equal to the highest of their two chosen Abilities.
Escalation
A character may choose to increase the Spotlight cost of starting the scene by 2 (and of Joining by 1) to Escalate the Scene. This changes the “baseline” for the scene, expanding the scale of the environment, and making higher-Tier Actions both easier and necessary.

The Tier of both Goals and Actions may be raised by 2 at the cost of 4 Agency/Successes and 4 Impact/Power. This trade cannot be taken more times than the number of Escalations, and if, during Scene Resolution, any Goal total has a lower Tier than double the Scene’s Escalations, it is instead discarded without effect. 
Targets
A Scene intended to directly affect another character, their Assets, or Projects typically has to have a Target, either the character directly, or something known to be associated with them.

A character can only be directly targeted (and therefore forcibly included into the Scene) if the character starting the Scene or an Ally they are in contact with is either Tracking them or in Contact with them.

Indirect effects, such as obstructing a Project or destroying an Asset, likely require the character to know its location, nature, or both.
Secrecy
Events have Secrecy, limiting how easily other characters can participate.
Secluded
A Secluded Scene is one that is absent from any other people or Assets except those being introduced by the players, such as an abandoned building, a forest clearing, or a wasteland valley. The Overt trait is ignored for all purposes besides in-Scene Stealth, including Offenses and other characters learning what happened after the Scene’s conclusion.
Public
A Public Scene is one that takes place in a location not controlled by any particular character, and has no special requirements to join, such as a trip to the market to purchase Project supplies, visiting a bar for information or simple rest and recovery, or a library for research.
Restricted
A Restricted Scene is similarly in a location not controlled by any active character in the story, but has some requirement a character must possess before they can directly join. A high-society ball, for example, might only be accessible to those with the right Reputation or Wealth Talents, or an appropriate Status, Connections, or Access Asset.

A character lacking such permission may still Join, but must overcome a Scene Goal to bypass security or whatever other barrier denied entry (ex. By creating a one-time-use Access Asset) before they may otherwise participate in the Scene. They may choose to do this in a Flashback. 
Confidential
A Confidential Scene takes place in a location controlled by or directly related to an active character, usually linked to an Asset they possess or a Project they worked on. A character may only start a Confidential Scene in a location they know of. Likewise, other characters Joining the Scene must either know of the location themselves, or have Contact or Tracking on the starting Character.

Many Confidential locations may have security or other barriers to entry similar to a Restricted Scene. These can usually only be freely entered at the direct invite of the controlling character, with all others needing specific Access Assets.
Stealth
When starting or Joining the Scene, a character may choose to do so already in Stealth. Doing so may make many Goals easier, but limits a character’s options and may have consequences if caught.

To have Stealth on entering a Scene, the character must pay 1 Agency for each Overt Asset they bring into the Scene, +1 for each Tier of the Asset.

Additionally, entering a Confidential or Restricted Scene in Stealth without the explicit permission of the location’s controller constitutes an Offense.
Contact/Tracking
Characters have Contact with each other if their most recent Scene ended with both Concealed or out of Stealth entirely. If only one is Hidden or Undetected against the other, they gain Tracking on the other character instead. In either case, this lasts until the character enters a Scene that doesn’t involve the target character, or the target character exits a Scene while Hidden or Undetected.

Characters may also voluntarily stay in Contact if they have the ability to communicate with each other.
Goal Creation
When a player names a Goal for a character on starting the Scene, they are describing some tangible result they want to get involved in the Scene for (ex. A new Ally or Connection, information on an Adversary’s plans), and then dictating the existence of something in that Scene that will get them that result (a sympathetic NPC they could persuade to help them; a journal of secrets locked away in a workshop safe). This thing does exist in the Scene, though the character may not know specifically where (and figuring it out may well be the first stage of a Project to complete it). The GM or table may, however, veto wildly outlandish or excessively trivial tasks.

Goals cannot be established for targets the starting character lacks sufficient knowledge of (ex. The nature of a Project, the type of an Asset), except to gain said knowledge. 

The character is of course free to improvise other means of accomplishing the same overall objective or entirely new tasks meant for different purposes, based on the events and details established within the Scene. However, any such opportunities are not guaranteed the way Goals are.
Reactions
A character may take a Reaction to Join a scene they are not already participating in as an instigator or target as long as they meet any prerequisites of the location, above, unless the character starting the Scene has them Tracked or in Contact and is specifically avoiding them. A target will also need to use a Reaction to activate any Talents or spent Effort to defend themselves, if desired.

Each Reaction costs 1 Spotlight, before any penalties or costs from applied Talents. Like Turns, a character cannot spend more AP on any single Reaction than their starting Spotlight.
Blitz
If a character has not taken their turn yet and wishes to React to participate in a starting scene, they take penalties within the Scene due to a lack of preparations. These penalties are equivalent to the difference in Priority, and the player can choose to spend Spotlight to negate the penalty at a rate of 2 points per Spotlight spent. 
Goal Addition
A character Joining a Scene follows the same basic rules for Goal Creation as above, with the addendum that there are already Goals established when they make their decisions.

A character cannot have Goals that interact with a character they don’t have Tracked or are in Contact with, including their Assets, Projects, and any Goals they have set for the Scene. After all, they don’t know they’re there. They may, however, choose similar Goals for the same targets (ex. A second heist crew breaking into the same bank on the same night for the same reasons as the first.) They may similarly establish Goals that (they hope) could counteract something they think could happen, targeting an appropriate Asset, Project, or character they do know about (ex. An investigator staking out the bank on a hunch, who knows how to activate the manual lockdown on the vault if they see something suspicious.) However, this only guarantees that action is possible, not that it will actually accomplish what they intended (ex. Manually locking down the door will not complicate a heist Project if the established Goal was a weak point in the wall.)
Goals
When starting or Reacting to enter a Scene, any number of Goals may be declared, as above. The following are example Goals and how they are ruled.
Complicate
Complicate Goals intend to erase progress made on the Narrative-Scope Projects of opponents, or make Obstacles or Crises they are facing more daunting. This may take the form of direct attacks on Project elements, destroying critical mitigating elements to an existing Obstacle or Crisis, or running Projects to create new obstructions or other complicating factors.
Conflict
A character may engage in a scene to defeat another character or organization. If the target in the Scene makes a Dramatic Escape, any character invested in this Goal and capable of interfering may take a special Reaction, making an immediate roll against the Goal’s difficulty and completing it on a success. Other characters may also attempt, or React to support another attempt. If no similar Goals are still pending, this and any other completed Conflict Goals may be totaled as per Scene Resolution and resolved as an Attack two Tiers higher than the Scene Goal, as normal. If the target survives, they still make a Dramatic Escape.

In addition to directly attacking the target, this also covers indirect or supporting methods of attack such as Projects to delay the reinforcements that would normally cover their Dramatic Escape, block/trap escape routes, rig their office/house/etc. to explode, and so on. These Goals generally cannot be completed after the target leaves the Scene.

Finally, characters reliant on certain Ascended Abilities such as Wealth, Connections, Organization, or similar abilities that represent outside resources they control may be harmed by attacks on those resources.
Progress
A Goal when attempting to Progress a Narrative Challenge or Project might be just a smaller-scale version of the same problem, requiring a Scene-level Project or overcoming a Scene-level Challenge. However, the more abstract nature of Narrative-level events may make other tasks a more valid representation, such as battling a criminal gang to end a Crisis of lawlessness.  
Training
Training is always a Narrative-level Project, and is advanced with Progress Goals. Training Goals might typically involve finding an instructor, using Abilities or Talents in structured practice, or even simply going into live-fire circumstances with a focus on using the feature in question and reflecting on what worked and what didn’t. 

Some features, such as additional Abilities like Wealth, Network, or setting-dependent ones like Magic, may require more specific measures: arcane rites, favor trading, or securing more money.

Any Training Goals achieved during a scene are applied as Progress towards the Project representing the training (see Progress, and Character Advancement, below) 
Travel
Crossing significant distances (ex. Between cities) is an Project.
End of Round
At the end of a round, first any “End of Narrative Round” Crises trigger, then all Actors Recover damage on the Scene track.
Scenes
The structure of a scene mirrors that of the Narrative, above, with the following differences:
Action Points (AP) are used in place of Spotlight, and are spent to declare Actions or React to other Actions. Starting and Maximum AP is calculated the same as for Spotlight, except using the Primary/Supporting Abilities chosen for the Scene.
Effort is used in place of Resources, and is spent to raise the Power of rolls or invoke Talents. Starting and Maximum Effort is calculated the same as for Resources, except using the Primary/Supporting Abilities chosen for the Scene.
Initiative takes the place of Priority, being bought with AP at the start of each Round and determining turn order within the Round.
Quick Scenes
If a character starts a Scene unopposed, for the sake of speeding up the plot to get to a point where more players get to act, the Scene may be resolved in the manner of an Action, rolling the Abilities chosen for the Scene and applying any relevant Talents or other Bonuses, then distributing the resulting Successes and Power across the Goals chosen for the Scene. The player then briefly explains what they did to accomplish (or fail) those Goals and play returns to the Narrative.
Flashbacks
A Flashback is a Scene started from inside another Scene, showing something the character starting the Flashback did in the past. A Flashback is always resolved as a Quick Scene, even if another character Reacts to join it, in which case they Support or Oppose the roll as they would for an Action.

Flashbacks normally cannot have an immediate, hostile direct effect on another character, though clever use of them may allow literal or metaphorical “old wounds” to be targeted in the present.

Any character, in the Scene or outside of it, may declare a Flashback at any time for the cost of 2 Spotlight.
Cutaways
A Cutaway is a Scene declared during another Scene, but focusing on what other characters are doing in the present. Similarly to Flashbacks, Cutaways are Quick Scenes even if others Join. However, Cutaways cannot be directly started by, joined by, or target characters that are already in an existing Scene, unlike Flashbacks, but can have immediate effects. Ally or Follower Assets or similar effects may allow a character in-Scene to start or join a Cutaway by proxy, however.
Plot Armor
The Action PA track is the most dynamic, Recovering at the end of every round. All damage heals at the end of each scene. If the Action track is exhausted, it refills to full at the cost of 1 point of Scene PA, mirroring the Scene track, above.
Beginning of Scene
If the Scene has a Target, that character or Asset and any friendly characters may start the Scene wherever their players consider the most likely location. All others must start the Scene in a Zone with an Exit.

Characters do not have any knowledge on whether any characters they are not Tracking or in Contact with are in the Scene, regardless of whether they chose to enter in Stealth, until they actually detect them. If a character is not in Stealth, however, they are automatically and passively detected at the first opportunity.

Any characters that chose to enter into the Scene in Stealth are Undetected (or Unknown, as appropriate) to any non-allied characters who are not Tracking or in Contact with them, and Hidden to any that are.
Rounds
The Primary Ability Group chosen to get the character’s AP/Effort for the round is determined by the player that started the Scene. The Supporting Ability is chosen separately for each Character. Exerting for more AP or Effort costs PA on the Action track (APA).
Turn
On a character’s turn within a scene, they may declare an Action. As above with Scenes, they may start additional Actions at any time after for 2 AP each, up to a total of their starting AP.
Reaction
Instead of participating in a scene, a Reaction at the Scene scope involves the character opposing or supporting the Action or Reaction triggering it.
Blitz
If a character has not taken their turn yet and wishes to React to an Action, they will have to pay an additional 1 AP for every two points of Initiative between the current turn and their own.

They may instead take a Dice penalty equal to the difference in Initiative.
Multiple Attempts
If a character takes multiple Reactions to the same prompt, ex. Both dodging and using a Talent to counterattack an attack, each subsequent Reaction costs +1 AP. A similar penalty applies to attempts to React to a Reaction (ex. Dodging a counterattack.) This penalty is cumulative.
Passive Reactions
Some effects such as Armor or certain Talents allow characters to take a specific type of Reaction (usually Opposing an incoming Attack) passively. Such Reactions do not cost AP and do not suffer penalties from Blitz, but cannot be boosted by spending Effort or other voluntary effects such as Chaining. Any bonus from something granting a Passive Reaction always applies to that Reaction, however.
Free Reaction
A Free Reaction does not cost AP but is otherwise normal.
Saves
If a character or one of their Major Intimacies are under threat, they may attempt a Save, Reacting without any AP cost, penalties, and without concern for any statuses limiting their options. They also gain bonus Dice/Power equal to their LCK/WILL. However, this roll costs 1 SPA, and the character takes a 2nd degree status of the attacker’s choosing.
Movement and Distance
Scenes are divided up into Zones. Zones are large regions of the map or Scene that are separated from each other by Obstacles, Hazards, Choke Points, or other dividing features. Unless an Action may be taken at Range, it may only be used on targets within the same Zone as the acting Character. 

Characters may move between Zones as an Action. Additionally, they may also move via Drift.
Drifting
Drift represents the way cinematic action tends to wander around the setpiece, with fights turning into back-and-forth chases depending on who has the advantage without interrupting the action to turn tail and run away. At the beginning of every round after the start of a Scene, immediately after Initiative is decided and in descending order of Initiative, Characters may choose to either Drift or Pursue.

A Drifting character chooses an adjacent Zone to move to, and optionally may choose to spend AP or Effort on this motion. If they cannot cross into this Zone without passing an Obstacle, they must spend AP equal to its Difficulty, if any, and Effort equal to half its Resistance, if any. Likewise, they will be affected by any Hazard they Drift through without paying. If the Obstacle/Hazard has a higher Tier than the Scene’s Escalation, increase the AP/Effort cost by 4 for each Tier.

A Pursuing character waits until after all Drifting characters have declared their intentions, then may choose to either follow a Drifting character, spending to cross any Obstacles or Hazards as above, or staying in place. If they stay, they may choose to force a Drifting character to stay with them by spending a higher total of AP and Effort than they did.
End of Round
After the last character has taken their turn and all Reactions have been resolved, the Round ends. Any “End of Action round” crisis effects trigger, then all characters Recover on the Action track.
End of Scene
A scene ends and play returns to the Narrative scope when one of several things happens:
All remaining players involved agree there are no more useful actions to be made, at least without a serious tone/environment change (ex. Heist → chase, party → shootout)
The character that started the scene has succeeded in their goal and they and all their allies have and left the scene
Dramatic Escape
At any point during a scene, a participating character may make a Dramatic Escape, where events contrive (at significant risk or expense to the character) to separate them from any immediate danger and let them flee the scene.

The cost of a Dramatic Escape is normally 1 NPA, or a Narrative-scope Dilemma, and cannot be reduced below this. If one of the goals of the scene is attacking the escaping character, see Conflict Goals, above.

Any NPA damage the character has taken during the Scene, is currently being taken when they choose to Dramatically Escape, or that they take as a consequence of a Conflict Goal may be considered towards this cost if the player can contrive how those actions eject them from the scene.
Exiting a Scene
A character that is in a Zone with an Exit Point may choose to Exit the scene as an action. This fails if any character successfully opposes their attempt.
Return to Narrative
At the end of the Scene, any completed Goals are tallied up and assessed as under Scene Resolution, above, then all characters not part of the Scene learn of any Overt events that occurred during the Scene and any knowledge relevant to them. Finally, play resumes in the Narrative level.
Transitions
At the end of the fourth and every subsequent Round of a Scene, roll a single die. On a success, nothing happens. On a failure, the Scene is paused as play immediately transitions back to the Narrative level as described under Return to Narrative, above, except that the Scene continues. Any characters not in the Scene may decide to Join the Scene, or start a different Scene following the normal rules, except that any character in the existing Scene cannot Join the newly-created one.

Assuming the new Scene is not abbreviated as a cutscene, it is recommended to put playing through it on hold until the current Scene ends, although the two are concurrent in Narrative time. Any new characters joining the Scene have Goals established as normal, though they cannot contradict other information established during the Scene.

Finally, if any Offenses have been revealed or Overtly committed, the GM or Table may choose to add Minions acting on behalf of the offended power. Play then continues, and the countdown until the Transition die gets rolled resets.
Actions
Standard Difficulty
Unless otherwise stated, the Difficulty for an Action is 1, and they have 0 Resistance.
Effort
A character may spend Effort on any rolled action to activate various Talents or increase the Power of an action by 2. The total Effort spent on any single Action or Reaction cannot exceed their starting Effort.
Reaction
Instead of rolling, Reactions simply treat half of the dice being rolled as Successes.

The “roll” for the Reaction may still be enhanced by spending Effort or spending dice/power on Tiers or Talents, as normal.
Support
Supporting an Action gives the acting character extra dice equal to the number of successes on the Reaction, and half the Reaction’s Power.

A character may only be supported by one other character, but the supporting character may themselves be supported.
Oppose
A character opposing the Action subtracts their Successes/Power from the acting character’s before the Action resolves. Only one character can Oppose the same Action, but the Opposing character can themselves be Supported by a third party. An Oppose attempt cannot itself be Opposed, but a character that would have the opportunity always qualifies to Support the original Action.
Parry
Usually used to Oppose Attacks in melee, a Parry instead must overcome both the Successes and Power of the Action it Opposes. If the Action’s Successes do not overcome the Parry’s, the margin of victory is added to the Parry’s Power before applying that against the Action. However, if the Action has more Successes than the Parry, the Action’s Power cannot be reduced below the margin of success. If the Parry is of a higher Tier than the Action, it negates it automatically, as usual.

However, unlike a normal Oppose it gains bonuses from any weapons or other Gear used to Parry, and some Talents trigger on Parries specifically.
Evade
An Evade Reaction can usually only be taken to avoid attacks directed at the Reacting character (though creative uses like tackling an ally out of the way, or even wildly changing topics to avoid a difficult question are possible). An Evade attempt gets upgraded one Tier for free, but at the cost of being forced out of a good spot, or into a bad one.

If the character is benefiting from helpful Terrain (Choke Point, Fortified, Concealment, etc.) that does not affect the entire Zone, they are forced out. If they have any Protection status for any other reason, they also lose it.

Otherwise, the character becomes Threatened by a Hazard in/adjacent to the Zone. If there is no such Hazard, a new one may be introduced, or the character may simply get knocked Prone.

A Restrained Character cannot Evade.
Types of Action
Attack
Attack actions are those that target other characters with the intention to harm them. A successful Attack deals its Power in damage against the target’s Action track.
Lethal
Attacks may have the Lethal trait, raising the Track receiving damage by one level, as with spending a Tier. Lethal is not cumulative; if an Attack would get Lethal from more than one source, each one after the first instead grants +2 Power.
Sweep
A Sweep Attack may target any number of characters in reach (usually Engaged), in an order of the attacker’s choice. The same roll is used for all targets. However, if any damage is dealt after mitigation or if a character mitigates it with a Parry, that much Power is reduced from the roll against all subsequent targets.
Splash
A Splash Attack is inherently Lethal or otherwise has its damage raised through Tier. Additionally, it Attacks with regular damage to all Characters within the next largest area in the progression. 

This includes the original target, if the main attack missed. They can avoid this by spending a Tier from their Reaction, or mitigate it with any remaining Power.
Dilemmas
A successful Attack can also be used to force a Dilemma (below) onto the target character.
Initiate
An Initiate action attempts to introduce a new Crisis or Project into the scene. The player describes what the character intends to set up and the way they plan to go about it, the intended Successes, Power and Tier of the completed Project, and, correspondingly, the D/R/Tier of the Progress Actions required to advance it. They then take a Progress Action towards this Project as part of this Action.
Counter
Countering allows a character to dismantle an opponent’s preparations, invoked Talents, or other bonuses directly. This is resolved as an Attack with a Dilemma removing the damage if they cancel the countered effect. If they refuse, the Power of the Attack is increased by 2 or the amount provided by the Bonus, whichever is higher.

Scene-length Bonuses from higher-Tier Prepare Actions or Impact or Agency spent on entering the Scene require Actions of an equivalent or higher Tier to Counter. Bonuses from Agency or Impact are 2 Tiers higher than normal.
Exit
An Exit action allows a character to leave a scene. This fails automatically if successfully opposed.
Guard
A Guarding character rolls as if for a Reaction, ex. Blocking incoming attacks, then may apply the results of that roll against all triggers valid for that reaction until their next Action without paying the base 1 AP cost per Reaction. Any penalties to the cost, such as from reaction to a Reaction (ex. Guarding against attempts to oppose someone else Exiting the scene) still have to be paid.
Miscellaneous
An action that doesn’t fit any others described succeeds automatically without a roll, unless opposed.
Move
A move action that does not cross a Hazard, Obstacle, or enters or leaves a Zone of Difficult Terrain (Environment, below) succeeds without a roll unless opposed. If such a feature is present, a roll must be made vs. its Difficulty/Resistance. If the roll fails against an Obstacle or Difficult Terrain, the character fails to move. If it is a Hazard, the character still succeeds but suffers the Hazard in passing.

Only one roll is made for all challenges facing the Action, and the Difficulty/Resistance of all challenges of the highest Tier is cumulative.
Prepare
Preparing gives bonuses to a future Action or Reaction equal to half the Prepare Action’s Power. If the Tier is raised above the minimum requirements of the Scene’s Escalation, the bonus instead lasts until the end of the Scene.
Progress
A Progress Action attempts to advance work on one of a character’s Projects, obstruct progress on another character’s Project, or advance or mitigate a Crisis. When affecting an existing Project or Challenge, the player describes how they are obstructing or advancing it and then rolls against the D/R of the target, either lowering or advancing the Project or Crisis by 1 step on a success and raising or lowering any Progress on it by the remaining Power.
Recover
A successful Recover action allows a character to Recover damage on the Action track. This fails automatically if successfully opposed.
Escalation
If the Scene was Escalated when it was started, Actions within the Scene must have a minimum required Tier of at least double the number of Escalations.
Escalating Actions
When declaring the attempt and before rolling, the player may choose to increase the AP cost of their Action by 2 (or Reaction by 1) and spend 4 successes and 4 Power to raise its Tier by 2. This cannot be done more times to a single roll than the Scene as a whole was Escalated. 
Universal
The following apply equally to both Scene and Narrative turn structure.
Intimacies
Intimacies are a representation of the character’s emotional connections to the world, what they believe, and how they think. Intimacies have three traits: a subject (a person, place, concept, ideal, ambition, etc.), an emotional context (ex. Respect, love, hatred, devotion), and a strength (Major or Minor).

A Minor Intimacy represents something the character feels strongly enough about to take risks or sustain long-term goals over, and grants +2 Power to all rolls made in line with that Intimacy, such as Reacting to defend a positive Intimacy, or Attacking a negative one. In Social conflict, it also applies to other characters’ Influence rolls that leverage that Intimacy.

A Major Intimacy represents something the character would be willing to risk everything for, including potentially giving their lives for if the situation was sufficiently desperate. It gives the same effects as a Minor Intimacy, and additionally gives the character the option to make Saves on any roll in line with that Intimacy. In Social conflict, the Tier required to inflict damage is increased by 1 if the Influence runs counter to an existing Major Intimacy. However, if a hostile Influence action leverages a Major Intimacy, it is instead upgraded one Tier.

Finally, taking Actions or Scenes in line with any Intimacy despite the player understanding they are foolish, reckless, unnecessarily dangerous, or otherwise counterproductive to long-term goals is one of the primary ways of earning Ascension Tokens and Eternity Marks, below.
Social Conflict
Pure Social conflict does not directly try to harm a target, merely change their outlook and opinions. For the purposes of tracking and resolution, however, an attempt to influence a character still uses similar mechanics to an Attack, merely carried out with words and appeals in place of violence, with the caveat that a Social influence roll will always have an associated Dilemma, usually forgiving all related damage if the target changes their Intimacies or takes an Action the influencing character is attempting to encourage. This damage represents the distraction and morale loss that comes from a mind clouded by convincing argument or conflicted emotion, and so fades away when the target has made a decision.
Changing Intimacies
Intimacies represent what a character values and how they see the world, and a major use of social conflict is to sway others into agreeing with one’s own perspective, or at least moving them away from opposing it.

The Dilemma imposed by the Influence attempt and its related damage may affect the target depending on the severity of the highest track its associated damage is on.

If an Influence attempt aims to change an existing Intimacy, that Intimacy always resists it. It is thus recommended to first instill a new, conflicting Intimacy that can be leveraged against the original one.
Temporary Intimacies
If an Influence Action has only affected the Action PA track, it can only create an Intimacy that lasts as long as the Scene does. This is always Minor. It may also alter an existing temporary Intimacy, if one exists.
Minor Intimacies
If the Influence has presence in the SPA track, it may modify existing Minor Intimacies or create new ones.
Major Intimacies
Only if the Influence has affected the NPA track can a Major Intimacy be affected. Due to the difficulty of the task, this is usually the result of Narrative-level Projects taking multiple Scenes to reinforce lessons or deprogram brainwashing.
Affecting Actions
Actions can likewise be attached to a Dilemma associated with an Influence Action, persuading the target to make a certain decision. Similarly, the scale of the decision imposed varies with the highest track the Dilemma has affected.

If an Influence Action deals damage only to lower tracks than what it would need in order to be viable (ex. Only APA damage for a Sceen-level Dilemma), it instead fails entirely.
Action
An Action-level Dilemma cannot affect more than the next Action the target takes, and cannot directly lead to obvious harm worse than APA damage. Telling a foe to “pick a fight with someone their own size” might convince them to charge an obviously-capable fighter. Insulting someone’s bravery because they won’t swan dive into a vat of molten metal to prove themselves will not work (unless they can survive it).
Scene
A Dilemma that has affected the Scene track can motivate them to alter their plans for the current Scene, such as Exiting the Scene, abandoning one of their current Goals, or assisting with someone else’s. Alternatively, it can induce them to start or join one future Scene.
Narrative
A Dilemma present in the Narrative track can convince the target to do pretty much anything, assuming it’s persuasive (i.e. damaging) enough, up to and including handing over all of their Assets and walking out of the story entirely. However, this is already very difficult, and trying to convince them to go back on Major Intimacies will make it even harder.
Defeat Through Talking
An Adversary ceases to be an Adversary if, as a result of Influence or other factors, they have no negative Intimacies for any PCs, positive Intimacies for other Adversaries, or Intimacies of any context that clearly motivate them at cross purposes to the PCs, and have no active Projects harmful to the PCs. (note: many Adversaries may find “sunk cost” a valid reason to continue a project they have since lost their original motivation for, and need to be talked, forced, or thwarted into canceling it anyway.) Likewise, the inverse situation might break down a PC and turn them away.

Such a “defeated” character might simply retire from the story, if they have no other Intimacies that would keep them in, or become a powerful Ally or even an additional PC.
Ascension Tokens
Ascension Tokens are the “carrot” the system uses to encourage roleplay, particularly the non-optimized play that turns characters into scheme-disrupting agents of chaos.

If a player chooses an Action for a character based on the character’s Intimacies despite said Action being clearly disruptive to their long-term plans, unnecessarily dangerous, or otherwise something the player understands is clearly a bad idea, they immediately gain one Ascension Token. 

Similarly, many Flaws give Ascension Tokens when the player decides they are relevant and invokes them.

A Token can be spent on any Action or Reaction at any point during the process, including after the roll, to raise the result by one Tier, as the player describes how environmental factors, random coincidence, a lucky flute of skill, or other quirks of fate conspire to make the attempt far more successful than it otherwise would have been. The nature of how a Token affects the Action means any Spillover it causes through the Tier increase cannot be negated. A Token can be spent on the same Action that earned it, and only one can be spent per attempt.
Eternity Marks
Eternity Marks serve the same purpose as Ascension Tokens, but on a grander scale. 

If a player instead starts an entire Scene or Narrative-level Project based on Intimacies, in the same manner as an Actions may earn Ascension Tokens, the character is eligible for an Eternity Mark.

Success or failure doesn’t matter; as long as the character puts forth a good-faith effort to uphold the Intimacies that got them into this situation and survives, they gain an Eternity Mark. (If survival was never in doubt, it’s worth revisiting the question of whether it was worth an Eternity Mark at all.)

Each Mark a character has is a crucible of experience and resolve, and every subsequent Action or Reaction gains +1 Power, as a result of this trial by fire. Additionally, when part of a similar, if less dangerous or self-destructive Scene, one Action or Reaction (per Mark) can be upgraded by one Tier, as the character applies lessons their experience has taught them.

Many Flaws that can affect the Narrative level likewise give the character opportunities to earn an Eternity Mark by either overcoming them, or giving in at the worst of times.
Overt
An Overt Action or Project is one that has highly visible or loud aspects that will immediately get attention, or will get immediate attention if they are discovered. Performing an Overt Action, Reaction, or completing an Overt Project will immediately trigger passive Reactions to identify the character and their presence, as above, and if they take an active Reaction, it is upgraded by 1 Tier.
Overt Assets

Some Assets are automatically Overt, such as large or flashy pieces of Gear, a particularly (in)famous Reputation or Appearance, or some Ascended Abilities. Merely possessing them does not ruin Stealth, but any attempt to gain Stealth must be of a Tier equal to the Asset and takes a penalty equal to its Bonus. Similarly, attempting to enter a Scene in Stealth with such an Asset costs Agency and Impact, as above.
Overt-Use
Other Assets or Talents may be Overt-Use, and do not passively impact Stealth, but cause any Action using them to be Overt. Explosives, firearms, and fire effects tend to be Overt-Use.

The passive Reaction to detect an Overt-Use Action occurs after the Action has resolved.
Overt Evidence
Finally, some Actions are not inherently Overt, but will leave evidence so noticeable it likewise will be observed passively if any character is in a position to perceive it, such as dead or unconscious bodies, destroyed obstacles, or similar. If they are found, the Action becomes treated as Overt. If they are not removed, repaired, or otherwise corrected by the end of the Scene, the Action becomes Overt and thus known to the table.
Stacking
If an Action is Overt for multiple reasons, any Reactions, active or passive, are upgraded one Tier for each occurrence.
Offenses
Any Action or Project that a character performs that would cause a far more powerful entity to take direct action against them constitutes an Offense. Often in civilized regions this means violating the laws of a local government or making transgressions against leaders of it, but any individual or organization two or more Tiers above the Offending character may qualify if sufficiently angered.

An Offense can be smoothed over, atoned for, or buried as a Project of equal D/R/Tier as the Offending Action, or by sacrificing a Connections or other relevant Asset of equal Bonus and Tier.

An Offense back come back to haunt the character that committed it in several ways:
Overt Offenses
If the Action or Project that caused the Offense was also Overt, the Offense becomes a Crisis of the same D/R/Tier as the triggering event, an Persistence of 1, +1 for each other such Crisis that has been triggered in this Scene. This advances by in-Scene round if the trigger was an Action or in-Scene Project, and spawns Minions appropriate to the Tier and nature of the offended power. Additionally, if this Crisis completes, or the trigger was a Scene Goal or otherwise in the narrative level, it triggers a Narrative-level Crisis equivalent to the original, but two Tiers higher.

This Crisis advances once per Narrative-level round and has Persistence 1, +1 for each previous such Crisis. On completion, if the character’s real Identity was hidden, it is revealed to all other characters (including destroying any Aliases), and the offended power automatically sends Minions into any Scene the character does, unless they have total Stealth from all non-friendly characters. Even if they do, Minions will arrive by Crisis as above if the character is detected. These Minions have the Goal of killing or capturing the offending character, and will continue coming until they are successful, the character flees the story entirely, or succeeds at an equivalently difficult Project to throw off the scent.

If the same character commits another Overt Offense, advance the Crisis by 1, or upgrade the Minions by 1/1.
Investigations
If an Offense was not Overt, the game’s assumption is that the natural progress of any official investigation will be too slow to affect the story, and to make progress other characters will have to advance it. See Investigating Offenses, below.
Detective
At the GM or table’s discretion, if there are too many Offenses being committed against the same power, they may introduce a new Adversary representing said power, whose purpose is to conduct Investigations, as above.

Attacking the Detective is an Offense itself, making them hard to remove without making the situation worse. Eliminating the Detective will simply result in a higher-Tier Detective replacing them.
Mental Conflict
Mental Conflict, similarly to Social Conflict, uses the mechanical framework of Attack, damage, and Dilemmas to model investigation, strategy, and battles of wits.
Investigating Characters
One character may investigate another to learn information about them, such as their identity, any Assets they possess, Talents they know, their Abilities, Intimacies, and Flaws, and any Projects they have active and what progress they have made. 

Unlike Social Conflict, there are no firm rules on how severe a Dilemma must be to be worth revealing information; that decision is left entirely to the player whose secrets are getting probed.
Public Information
Some information about a character such as reputation or major Assets is public knowledge, and if the investigating character wouldn’t know it offhand, they can easily find out by asking around “between Scenes”. If an investigation reveals one piece of public information about a character, it instead reveals all of them.
Overt
Some Talents, Assets, or Projects have the Overt or Overt-Use traits, meaning that they are extremely recognizable either by presence or use. All characters capable of perceiving it may passively React to identify the subject in question, as above, though the character using it might still be a mystery.
Identity
A character’s Identity is always Public. However, if the target is acting under an Alias, attempts to reveal information about them instead reveal the Alias, which must be destroyed or disassociated from the character before their real identity can be revealed. Any known information about the Alias, such as Talents, Assets, Projects, etc. is then transferred to the real character.

If a character in a Scene is taking steps to conceal their Identity short of an Alias, they must be re-identified, although a player targeting them with an Action can simply guess and accept the risk of failing automatically if they are wrong.
Assets
Assets typically have three qualities an investigating character might need to know to destroy, steal, or counter them: location, type, and effect. Each must be discovered individually, unless the Asset is in use in the Scene. An Asset cannot be forced into a Scene as a target unless its location is known, and defining Goals affecting it may be difficult without knowing its Type or bonuses, as is attempting to strategize around it.
Talents
A Talent can be identified as a Reaction whenever it is invoked during a Scene, or as a Scene Goal if it is invoked while starting the Scene. It may also be investigated with Actions or Goals as normal by gathering evidence, following stories of past use or instruction, and so on. 
Abilities
Abilities may be investigated similarly to Talents, above.
Intimacies
As with Talents, an Intimacy can be identified as a Reaction/Goal when it is applied as a bonus or as a motivator for an Action or Scene (as with Ascension Tokens, above). The more visceral reaction of a Major Intimacy is treated as being Overt for this purpose.
Flaws
Flaws may be identified when they are triggered, as with Intimacies. Some Flaws may be Overt.
Projects
Like Assets, Projects have multiple traits that need to be identified separately. A Project has a Location, Result, Difficulty, Finesse, and Progress. Again, like Assets, a Project cannot be forced into a Scene as a target without knowing its location, and knowing more details of the Project will make it easier to plan around.
Traps
Traps act effectively as a reverse Dilemma. Rather than forcing a target to accept a status or take a certain Action or take damage, they instead threaten a target with damage if they do take a certain Action. The mechanism is still the same, however: the Attack is made, damage is calculated, and, unless the Trap is laid under Stealth or otherwise hidden, the target’s player has the option to eliminate the damage by declaring they will not perform the affected Action/Reaction/Scene. If they are somehow forced into doing so, the damage returns. 

If the Trap is secret and has been established while at least Undetected by the target or using Talents or Gear they are unaware of, the player may instead simply note the trap and roll for establishing it retroactively at the time it is triggered.

However, even the best-laid plans are often thwarted by the unknown unknowns, and the target’s player may instead choose to negate the Trap by revealing an unknown Asset or Talent that changes the prohibited act enough that the planned counter would no longer apply. For example, mining the exits to a Scene doesn’t matter if the intended target then uses previously-unseen parkour skills to leave via the walls instead.

A Trap is not necessarily a literal, physical trap; a character in a melee fight altering their stance so that the best approach for a given opponent is actually an easily-countered false opening would be a Trap blocking off a direct Attack from the target enemy, as would establishing a well-flanked killbox for anyone entering a specific Zone in a firefight, or even setting an opponent up for a scathing retort in a debate.

The largest effect the Trap can have is dependent on the highest PA Track the associated damage affects, and the Tier required for a successful Counter depends on the minimum Tier required to damage that Track for the given target character.
Action
An Action-level Trap can only impact the very next Action the target takes. A different character may attempt to Counter this before that Action is taken.
Scene
A Scene-level Trap instead blocks the targeted act for the full duration of the Scene, or until it is successfully Countered. If the intended target(s) attempt to Counter the Trap, the setting character gets a passive Reaction to Oppose their attempt unless the targets use an unknown Asset or Talent to do so, as the player explains how their character foresaw that particular method and took steps to complicate it.

A Scene-level Trap is one Tier above an Action-level Trap for the purpose of Counters.
Narrative
At the Narrative level, the Trap blocks off starting a certain Scene, such as preplanned defenses against an assault on a location. As above, the character setting the trap may passively Join any Scene with Goals set to Counter the Trap, either by proxy of Minions, Obstacles, or Crises added to the Scene by spending Agency/Impact or by retroactively explaining how they foresaw different attempts and took steps to complicate them.

As above, the character setting the Trap does not get this bonus against attempts leveraging Talents or Assets they didn’t know about. On the scale of a Narrative-level Trap, it may be easier or faster to bypass simply by acquiring a new relevant Asset. The controller of the Trap may update it to account for new knowledge between Scenes for free unless there is no plausible way they could have done so, however.

A Narrative-level Trap is four Tiers above an Action-level Trap for the purpose of Counters.
Investigating Offenses
If one character knows or suspects that another has committed an Offense, they may choose to speed up the wheels of justice (or vengeance, depending on their opinion of the offended power).

The investigating character takes an Action or starts a Project that intends to reveal more about the target’s connection to the committed Offense, mechanically framing it as an Attack, which the target may Oppose by describing how they have been covering their tracks.
Frame-Ups
A character may have an Offense faked for them as a Scene Goal or Project, which the target character gets a passive Oppose reaction against.

A Frame-Up itself is always an Offense.
Projects
A Project is a game structure meant to allow characters to accomplish tasks too large to be managed in a single Action or even Scene by subdividing it into smaller tasks. A completed Project is equivalent to a single Action 2 Tiers higher than the Actions or Scene Goals used to advance it, and with Successes and Power equal to the Difficulty and Resistance of those Actions. The player chooses the Difficulty, Resistance, and Tier when starting the Project, as well as the Finesse.

A Project requires four successful Progress Actions/Scenes to complete. If an Action/Scene is of a Tier 1 higher than required (after Tiers are spent), it counts double. An Action/Scene 2 Tiers higher may simply complete the Project in one try, being equivalent to the final result of the Project in the first place.
Finesse
Projects have a Finesse rating between 0 and 4, which increases the Difficulty by this value (but not the result of the completed Project). If this would raise it above its maximum value, reduce and raise the required Tier as normal, also without changing the final result of the Project. 

Finesse directly correlates to the amount of collateral damage or other consequences of the Project, as well as the amount of redundancies present if a mistake is made. If an Action/Scene intended to progress the Project fails, or they are sabotaged and have no advances to undo, the player may choose to reduce the effective Finesse by 1 instead of failing the Project entirely. Finesse cannot be reduced below 0 in this manner.
Finesse 0
A Finesse 0 Project will still accomplish its goals, but the consequences are of similar Tier to its intended function, and, while they are not necessarily (but can easily be) directly harmful to the character engaged in the Project, they are at least severe complications to their plans. For reference, consider a hostile Action of the same Tier, Difficulty, and Power as the Project, though not necessarily aimed directly at the PC/s involved, especially if this would be immediately fatal. A Finesse 0 Project is almost always Overt, and often constitutes an Offense.
Finesse 1
A Finesse 1 Project has consequences one Tier less severe, but similarly detrimental to the PC's situation. A Finesse 1 Project will typically require Actions that are either Overt or Offensive, even if the intended goal of the Project would not be.
Finesse 2
A Finesse 2 Project is either relatively consequence-free, or has a rough balance of positive and negative side effects.
Finesse 3
A Finesse 3 Project can have beneficial effects at a similar Tier as Finesse 2, which may include covering their tracks, raising the D/R/Tier of identifying the characters involved to the result of the Project.
Finesse 4
A Finesse 4 Project is the holy grail of planning, often nailing multiple birds with one stone. A Finesse 4 Project has effects similar to another, related project of the player's choice, though the additional effects will not be as clean as the main thrust of the Project. Alternatively, They may remove the Overt trait from the Action being attempted, having thoroughly eliminated any way to extract meaningful information about the task. If they do so they still gain the Finesse 3 benefits.
Progress
If an Action/Scene used to advance a Project has remaining Power after applying Resistance, this is attached to the Project as Progress, and becomes a Power bonus on the next attempt.
Recursion
A Project may itself be composed of other, smaller Projects. However, a Project cannot have greater Finesse than its subprojects. If a character has a Tier VI, Finesse 2 megaproject that is itself advanced by Tier IV Narrative-level projects, and they encounter a few setbacks that knock one of those sub-Projects down to Finesse 1, the entire Project must be knocked down to Finesse 1 or be abandoned.
Chaining
When an action, reaction, or scene builds on another such event previously established in the story, this establishes a Chain, giving that attempt +1 Power or Dice. This bonus grows as other attempts Chain off that one, going to +2 on the second follow-on attempt to +3 on one that follows on from that one, and so on.

Any active (passive Reactions do not count) attempt may be chained off of, regardless of success, failure, or the character who started it (as long as you can explain the connection), but a Reaction to oppose a Chained attempt cannot benefit from the same Chain. Prepare actions may continue a Chain, but they instead reset the bonus to their final result.
Breaking the Chain
A character may interrupt a Chained attempt with a Reaction. This Reaction always gets the full benefit of the Chain it is targeted against, and is resolved before the original attempt. When entering a Scene to break the Chain it is part of, the character retains this bonus on their attempts until they sufficiently interrupt the Scene.

If this Reaction succeeds, the bonus provided by the Chain is lost, and the attempt that triggered the Reaction is resolved without the bonus.
Flurry
A character may declare their intent to take multiple Actions or Scenes on consecutive Initiative counts. Each additional one after the first costs only half as much AP/Spotlight, but, if something breaks the intended sequence (ex. A combo of attacks is interrupted by a counterattack tripping them, a heist crew is forced to flee a scene before they get to the getaway vehicle), all remaining Actions/Scenes are canceled. The AP/Spotlight remains spent. 
Abstraction
For the sake of simplicity, Eternity Ascendant prefers to reuse the same systems in different contexts rather than invent new special-purpose rules.

Attack action and Conflict scenes are intended to cover all varieties of Man vs. Man plots, from violent combat to games of wits or social debate. As an example, a crime scene investigation would be run as the Detective “attacking” the Criminal by trying to find evidence to prove their identity, while the Criminal Reacts by retroactively declaring what they did to confound the Detective, using their own Actions to retroactively falsify evidence that throws them off course. If this interaction is repeated enough, this “damage” will accumulate until one of them runs out of Narrative Plot Armor, landing the Criminal in prison or the Detective permanently off the scent.

In cases that aren’t supposed to have lasting consequences for a character’s presence in the story, such as a friendly competition or wager in a game of wits, invoking a Dilemma to erase the damage makes for a “battle to first blood”.

Likewise, Obstacles, Hazards, and Crises are intended as adaptable tools for emulating Man vs. Nature/Environment conflicts, or more impersonal examples of Man vs. Society.
Plausibility
Eternity Ascendant is “Fiction First”, here meaning that the player describes the Action they want their character to attempt or invents a Goal they wish to add into the Scene based on the limits and themes established by the story, and then the table or GM decides on the best way to model that Action or Goal using the mechanics and systems in this document.

For example, an ordinary man attempting to attack a warship with a dinner knife is unlikely to actually damage anything meaningful, but it might serve to distract the crew. Thus, instead of the Physical Attack using a knife would usually be, it would instead be rolled as a Social Attack on the crew, and presenting them with a Dilemma vs. Distraction.

That said, Eternity Ascendant is intended to err on the permissive side, and permit experienced characters to accomplish things unimaginable to an ordinary man. A character capable of Tier 4 actions in their own right might absolutely be able to destroy a ship with a butter knife.

With that in mind, here are some base rules of thumb for deciding on actions:
If the player can’t explain how the action could reasonably result in the effect they want, pick a different action.
If the player can’t explain how they’re interfering during a Reaction, the character can’t React.
If the player can’t explain how a Talent, feature of equipment, or other effect is relevant to the action, they don’t get the effect.
Defending Damage
A character may always attempt to defend an Attack or Conflict, so long as they are at least aware of the possibility, have a reasonable means of defending, and have the AP available to spend. This may even take the form of flashbacks to retroactively declared actions, or routine behaviors that happen to complicate the opposed action. 

For example, a criminal opposing a detective’s investigation of the crime scene by elaborating on how they cleaned up the evidence they’re searching for, or a routine patrol happening to interrupt an assassin’s attempts to infiltrate their target’s estate.
Exertion
Characters may Exert themselves to spend additional AP or Effort as above or use certain Talents. Each point of Exertion deals one point of damage to the Action track, with no opportunity for reduction. If the character Exerts for extra Spotlight or Resources, or invokes certain Talents out-of-Scene at the Narrative level or while starting or joining a Scene, the damage instead goes to the Scene track.
Recovery
While time eventually heals all wounds (End of Round, above), characters may actively Recover plot armor by way of doing some Action to reverse whatever effect caused the damage. While this will often need to be a separate Action to ex. Perform first aid, depending on how damage was taken other Actions might Recover as a side effect. For example, if PCs have taken damage from Exertion on Resource talents, a scene ending with the PCs having secured a large amount of money may Recover that damage.
Delay
A Delayed effect is one that has significant amounts (at least one Round) of lag between when it is triggered and when it takes effect, and provides reasonable options to escape or avoid before it does so. In exchange, it is far more powerful than normal.
Scene Round
An Action using this Delay triggers on the 0 count of Initiative in the next round, and has its Tier increased by 1. Successes may be spent to raise the Count it detonates on on a 1-for-1 basis. If a Delay time is not specified, this one is the default.
Full Scene
An Action using this Delay triggers at the end of the Scene if it has not yet been dealt with, and has its Tier increased by 2. This cannot be used after the Scene Timer has started rolling.
Narrative Round
This follows the same rules as the Scene Round Delay, but at the Narrative scale, and its Tier is increased by 3.
Dilemmas
Dilemmas are a mechanism for “negotiating” resolutions to Attack scenes and actions other than outright damage. A character faced with a Dilemma is given the option to leave the fight without further harm, or even Recover from previously inflicted damage if reasonable, at the cost of a change in their motivations, loyalties, ties, assets, or future actions and scenes.

Refused Dilemmas can also be used to make damage from Attacks Lethal by changing the context. For example, an overt attack on a crime lord’s front company might not be a serious threat to their organization as a whole, but it might force them to retaliate in force because any appearance that people could get away with such an act would be crippling.
Defeat
When a character fills a track with damage, they cannot keep successes on any dice. If the filled track is the Action or Scene track, they may clear the damage in exchange for one point on the next track higher, representing the character committing more reserves to the fight, taking hits escaping a losing position, or otherwise trading long-term resources for immediate options. If the narrative track fills, the character is defeated and stops participating in the Narrative.

However, at the GM or table’s discretion, the character may instead suffer a significant loss, typically enough to reduce them in Tier, and have them rejoin the Narrative in a new context. This is especially viable in cases where the character was defeated through indirect methods, such as attacking a wealthy character’s resources or the organization a character leads, and the character is still threatening (if not as influential) in their own right.

This “reframing” removes all damage from the character. However, the lost Talents, Assets, and Abilities may only be regained the hard way (see Character Advancement, above).
Challenges
Challenges are environmental concerns, barriers, hazards, and growing threats that lack any agency to be interpreted as a character, but still affect the world and how characters engage and progress through it.
Obstacle
An Obstacle is distinct from a Crisis in that it will not change without active intervention. A cliff, locked door, trapped hallway, minefield, or puzzle would all be Physical Obstacles, while more abstract issues such as social conventions regarding access to important people, broaching of strong taboos topics, puzzling out complex systems and academic/scholarly questions might be Social or Mental Obstacles.

Obstacles have Tier, Difficulty, and Resistance just like most tasks, however they are often of a Tier significantly beyond what a character could reasonably accomplish in a single Action, requiring a Project instead.
Consequences
A character that fails to Overcome an Obstacle may suffer Consequences from the attempt, ex. Falling off a roof, triggering a trap, alerting guards, etc. This is usually an Attack of fixed successes and base Power, but may be an alternative action such as alerting guards. 
Crisis
A Crisis represents an entity or circumstance in the Narrative or Scene that actively changes if left to its own accord. Fires, floods, time bombs, poisons, epidemics, etc. are example Crises. More abstractly, a social issue with no clear leaders or structure, such as a panicking crowd, unruly mob, or crime wave may be run as a Crisis.

 A Crisis, mechanically, is treated as a self-advancing Project, automatically succeeding at progress attempts at a defined pace, typically once per Round. 
Persistence
The Persistence of a Crisis is the counterpart of a Project’s Finesse for attempting to combat the Crisis. If a Crisis has no un-countered successful advances made, an additional amount of Actions are required to fully eliminate the Crisis equal to the Persistence.
Progress
Unlike in a Project, a Crisis’s Progress is gained from and applied as a bonus to Actions/Scenes meant to manage the Crisis.
Evolution
A Crisis’s Evolution trait defines when it advances, and what occurs on completion. This is not necessarily negative; a crisis that simply disappears when completed could be used to track a Hazard that will naturally disappear with time, such as a passing storm, or a fire burning itself out.

A Crisis might also replace itself with another, bigger Crisis on completion, such as a fire spreading to additional Zones, herald the appearance of a powerful Minion or Adversary, or even transcend the Scene and become a lasting problem in the Narrative level.
Hazards
Hazards are entities or effects present in the Scene (or, less frequently, the Narrative) that present a threat to characters even without them intentionally engaging it, but still lack any will or sentience to be characters themselves.

A character deliberately trying to cross or otherwise interact with a Hazard without harm must roll against its Difficulty/Resistance/Tier, taking any shortfall in Successes or Power as damage from an Attack. Many Hazards, such as a narrow but deep pit, have additional damage or effects that apply only on a failure.

If a character is being forced into a Hazard, ex. By an Attack shoving them into a fire, treat the Hazard as Supporting the Action, using its D/R as the result for the Reaction. In addition, if the Hazard would deal damage of a higher Tier than required to harm the target, the Action gains Lethal.

For particularly dangerous Hazards, a character may choose to become Imperiled if they are forced into the Hazard or fail an attempt to avoid it. An Imperiled character is in a possibly-literal cliffhanger, and if they take any Actions except to attempt to Escape, the Hazard Opposes their roll, and they experience the Hazard with no roll at all. Additionally, the Hazard Opposes any Reactions they make while Imperiled.

An Obstacle or Crisis can also be a Hazard, in which case both rulesets apply. A deep pit or minefield, for example, would be a Hazardous Obstacle, and a spreading inferno would be a Hazardous Crisis.
Falling/Impact
Cliffs, walls, bridges, balconies, and so on make up some of the most common Hazards. The D/R and Tier of a fall, and the damage it will deal to a character, depends primarily on the height. 

From 1-10 feet, the fall is a Tier 0 Hazard with a Resistance equal to the height in feet and a Difficulty of half this, rounded down.

From 10-100 feet, it is a Tier 2 Hazard. Divide the height by 10 and find the D/R as above.

From 100-1000 feet, it is a Tier 4 Hazard. Divide the height by 100 then find D/R as above.

Above 1000 feet fall damage does not increase under normal gravity and atmosphere. If the ground is a hard surface, such as bare rock, the damage gains Lethal. If a character takes damage from a fall, they are knocked Prone.
Climbing
The D/R/Tier of climbing the same drop as an Obstacle mirrors that of the Hazard, but may be modified by up to a Tier in either direction to represent an especially rough and climbable surface or a smooth and difficult one. Attempting to climb and failing subjects the character to the Hazard. Drops that are unreasonable to climb back up within the timeframe of the Scene may be treated as Exits.
Stairs
Characters do not have to roll to climb or descend stairs unless Opposed. If they fail anyway, treat as a fall of half the stairway’s total height.
Environment
Map
The rules of this game are written to presume a game map for any sort of tactical combat, infiltration, chase, or other Physical Scene. However, the use of Zones and de-emphasis on specific measures such as feet or squares is intended to enable Theater-of-the-mind for tables or situations where map play is unavailable or not preferred.

The size of the map depends on the level of Escalation of the Scene, or otherwise can scale with the Tier of any major Scene Goals. A map for Tier 0 play might be a single street, clearing, or a large building, with individual Zones being small rooms, alleys, or subdivisions of larger spaces, as in the image under Zones, below.

A map for an Escalated Scene would have individual Zones being the size of an entire Tier 0 map, and represent an entire neighborhood, major compound or camp, etc. Escalating again would reduce that map to a single Zone, and so on.
Zones
Zones are spaces on the map that track physical location relative to the Scene. Any number of normal-sized) characters may occupy a typical Zone, and characters may interact with any other characters, Hazards, or other features of interest within the Zone they occupy. This may (narratively) require moving within the Zone, but the distances are small enough that it will not require a separate Action to do so.

A character may move between Zones with a Move Action or by spending a Tier to multitask during a different Action. This succeeds automatically unless opposed by another character or Obstacle. They may also Drift at the start of any Round except the first, as stated in Scenes, above.



Example Zone breakdown of a Scene:
Red - Entrance, contains Exit and is bordered by Tier 1 Obstacles separating it from each Balcony Zone
Blue - Balconies, each gives High Ground 1 in relation to any other Zone, and is separated from the Red, Yellow, and Green Zones by a Hazard. Yellow is additionally bordered by a Choke Point at the stairs.
Yellow - Wings, each divided from the central Purple Zone by a Tier 0 Obstacle, and from the Green and Blue Zones by Choke Points and Stair Hazards.
Purple - Central Aisle, divided from Wings by a Tier 0 Obstacle and Green by a Stair Hazard.
Green - Royal Dais, divided from Yellow and Purple Zones by Stairs and Choke Points, and by a Tier 1 Obstacle from the Blue Zones.
Difficult Terrain
Difficult Terrain can either be represented as an Obstacle forming the border between Zones, covered under Obstacles, above, or as an entire Zone in its own right.

If an entire Zone is Difficult Terrain, any movement in that Zone, such as entering or leaving the Zone, Engaging other characters, or interacting with Hazards they are not already Threatened by, requires a roll vs. the Zone’s D/R. This is cumulative with any other D/R sources unless a Tier is spent on multitasking.
Hazards/Hazardous Terrain
Dangerous elements of the environment can be represented as a single Hazard within a Zone, or as an effect across the entire Zone.

If a Hazard fills the entire Zone, any character entering the Zone or within or bordering the Zone on their first Action of the Round is subjected to the Hazard.

The first time a character interacts with a Hazard feature within a Zone, they become Threatened by it, indicating they are still nearby and could be forced into the Hazard. They remain Threatened until they take an Action that implies movement away, such as leaving the Zone, becoming Engaged with another character away from the Hazard, or similar. If unopposed, they may also simply state they are stepping away as part of an unrelated Action.
Engagement
Engagement is a way of tracking which characters in a Zone can directly affect each other. Any character may Oppose or Support Actions by or targeting characters they are Engaged with.
Engaging
A character becomes Engaged with another if they or the other character takes an Action that requires close contact, such as a melee weapon Attack, assisting with a Physical act, or relaying a secret through whispers. Additionally, a character becomes Engaged as a consequence of movement if another character Opposes their Move Action and successfully prevents it. Finally, if unopposed, they may simply choose to Engage another character as part of another Action.
Losing Engagement
A character loses Engagement if they move into a separate Zone from the other character or the target is subjected to forced movement away by a different attacker.

If either Engaged character takes an Action or Reaction that implies movement within the Zone, the other may choose to follow at no cost, taking the same Engagements or Threats as the original moving character. If they choose not to, they lose Engagement.
One-Way Engagement
Some circumstances, such as attacking with a longer weapon, result in a situation where one character may target the other much more freely than vice versa. In this case, the player of the benefiting character may choose whether they wish to count as Engaged or not for any given Action or effect.
Ranged Engagement
Some Talents and equipment such as rapid-fire weapons allow a character to engage another at a distance, or even from separate Zones. This is usually one-way and cannot be broken by movement as normal. Most such effects will specify a condition that ends it instead.
Movement
In general, a character’s exact position is abstracted down to the Zone they occupy, and their relative position to other characters and Hazards in or adjacent to the Zone, using Engagement and Threat tags respectively.
Within Zone
Characters may “move” within the Zone they occupy as part of any Action they take, becoming Engaged with or Threatened by any other characters or Hazards within the Zone, unless another character Opposes them and prevents their Action.
Between Zones
Moving between Zones either requires Drifting, above, or taking a Move Action. Any other character in either the target Zone or their current Zone may React to this Move Action. If the Action is prevented by another character Opposing it, the movement is halted and they become Engaged. If the Reacting character was in the target Zone, both characters move to the border, and the acting character may choose to enter the target Zone freely if the Opposing character loses Engagement for any reason.
Forced Movement
If a character is forced to move as a consequence of another effect such as a Shove, the player imposing that movement upon them may change their Engagement and Hazard tags as desired, or force them into a Hazard they are already Threatened by. 

The player may spend a Tier to instead force the target into a different Zone, or into an available Hazard they are not already Threatened by.
Range
Different Actions can only be taken at certain distances from the targets, or take penalties from being too far or too close.
Melee/Touch
A Touch range Action requires the character to be Engaged with their targets, though as usual they may choose to become Engaged with any target in the same Zone as part of the Action. Most Physical Actions require Touch unless supported by Gear or some other bonus, as might whispers or otherwise making a Social Action non-Overtly.
Short-Range
A Short Range Action can be taken at any distance, but the Difficulty is increased by 1 for each Zone they are from the target, including their own. They take no penalty and do not need to be Engaged with a target in their own Zone, a -1 penalty with a target in an adjacent Zone, and so on for further Zones.
Long-Range
A Long Range Action takes no penalty for any distance within the Scene. However, they may often leave the character Open and thus more vulnerable to Melee Reactions.
Extreme-Range
If a character has the means to take Extreme Range Actions, then at the start of the Scene, in lieu of entering the Scene physically, they may choose to declare a direction “off-map” they are positioned in and can act from. They may only take Extreme-Range Actions normally, or Long-Range Actions if a Tier is spent to increase this. Likewise, they may only be targeted by such Actions.
Time
The length of any given Action, Round, or Scene is variable depending on the nature of what is being done, but largely scales with Escalation: a Tier 0 Action might take seconds to a minute or two in a Scene that take a minute to an hour; while gods and empires acting at multiple Escalations might spend years on a single Attack.
Low-Tier vs. High-Tier
This system is not intended to have characters or crises of wildly different Tiers sharing narrative space directly; the exponential nature of Tiers will likely make such a struggle a foregone conclusion.

This is not to say that characters cannot have far grander motivations and ambitions than their current abilities, but that it should be handled differently than simply injecting gods and kings as Adversaries into a Narrative with characters far below them.
Descendance
If an Obstacle or Crisis is more than two Tiers greater than the PCs, it should exist and be challenged in the Narrative level, as opposed to being directly and wholly included in Scenes. If an Organization or Leader character is more than one Tier above the PCs, they likewise should exist primarily in the Narrative space. The full might of such an organization likely should not even fit into a Scene unless sufficiently the Scene is sufficiently Escalated.

If a singular Adversary is more than one Tier higher than the PCs solely in their own right, it should be considered whether to include them in the Narrative at all until the PCs have risen to challenge them on closer terms.
Crises
If a Crisis exists in the Narrative level within 3-4 Tiers of any characters attempting to influence it, the crisis can be managed using Scene Goals, injecting smaller versions of the Crisis, Projects, or even Minion enemies (ex. A gang leader to manage a Crime Wave crisis) to overcome.

Above this Tier, it will have to be managed with Narrative-level Projects in place of Actions, with the Crisis evolving at the end of every Story. 
Projects
As a completed Project can be translated to a higher-Tier Action, Projects can be recursed. If even a normal Narrative-level Project is insufficient to match the ambitions of a character, they may attempt a Project they can only feasibly advance through other narrative-level Projects.
Organizations
For Organizations, the players bringing this Organization into the Narrative choose D/T and Tier as if establishing a Narrative-level Project. The GM or Table then creates an Adversary that approximately lines up with this level of threat (i.e. In their area of expertise, they can expect an average roll matching the Action D/R/Tier of the chosen task) as a subgroup or lieutenant of the Organization. Overcoming this Adversary damages the Organization as if an Attack made by such a completed Project.
Characters
Broadly speaking, Eternity Ascendant assumes the Villain Threat Sorting Algorithm is in effect: the evil tyrant at the top of the ladder does not demean themselves to personally show up and burn down the hero’s farmstead until they are out of subordinates competent enough to delegate to.

If a character of much higher Tier is actively trying to engage the PCs in a Conflict, the story may instead treat their approach as a Narrative-level Crisis. Make an appropriate roll for what the character is attempting, and use that to set the D/R/Tier of the Crisis.

If the Crisis Escalates, the character arrives in-scene. This will not end well.
Character Creation
Both PCs and Adversaries are considered full characters as opposed to Minions, and have individual Abilities, Talents, Assets, and Defense.
Primary Stats
Characters have abilities and skills, separated into four groups:

Type
Action Ability
Effort Ability
Physical
Dexterity (DEX)
Strength (STR)
Social
Manipulation (MNP)
Charisma (CHA)
Mental
Intuition (INT)
Learning (LRN)
Endurance
Luck (LCK)
Willpower (WILL)


A character’s Abilities are set as follows:
Any two may be set to 3.
Any other four may be set to 2.
Any other two may be set to 1.
If any others are remaining due to the character’s Major Talents, they are set to 0. 

They may distribute a total of 5 points across any Abilities, to a maximum of 5 in any Ability.
Derivative Stats
A PC’s primary stats and any Talents they have combine to produce additional stats that cannot be directly raised in character creation.
Plot Armor (PA)
Each of a PC’s three PA tracks can take an amount of damage equal to their LCK + WILL. If this total is greater than 5, the player may choose to reduce the effective scores of these Abilities for this purpose by a total of 4, and increase their Defense Tier by 1.

A character cannot exceed 10 PA on any track.
Defense Tier
A character’s Defense Tier is the minimum Tier required for an Attack or any similar Action (ex. Influence, Investigate) to affect them or for a Hazard to harm them, whether or not they choose to React. This only counts unspent Tiers or bonuses that upgrade damage (ex. Lethal, Splash). If the Action is Opposed, it does not lose Tiers overcoming the Reaction’s own Tier, but if Tiers have to be spent negating Difficulty or Resistance, these are lost.
Talents
Talents, listed in a later section, define specific areas of skill, technique, or background that shape a PC, their primary modus operandi, and resources. Talents may have minimum requirements before a PC can begin acquiring them.

A Major Talent is a powerful effect that typically raises the Tier of a valid Action using it, either directly or by unlocking the use of an Ascended Ability. A Minor Talent is typically a smaller effect that either provides an addendum effect to Action/Reactions/Scenes for which it is invoked, or allows the player to take a penalty to said attempt in exchange for a larger bonus.

A starting character has one Major Talent, and 5 Minor Talents.
Assets
Assets, unlike Talents, are less something a character is or knows, but more temporary things they currently possess or have working in their favor, such as equipment, favors, allies, special access, etc. Assets have a Dice/Power rating, which applies as a bonus to Actions using that Asset. They may also have traits that allow (or require) dice/power to be spent to activate certain effects. An Asset cannot have a higher bonus than 5/5.

A character starts with 12 points of Assets, distributed across the dice/power of any number of Assets.
Flaws
A character’s Flaws are the quirks, skill deficiencies, or persistent environmental factors that somehow contrive to hold them back from glory. 

A character must have at least one Flaw, but players may assign more if they wish. Playing into a character’s Flaws is one of the common ways of giving them Ascension Tokens and Eternity Marks.
Intimacies
A character must have at least one Major and one Minor Intimacy, but players may assign more if they wish. Playing into a character’s Intimacies is one of the common ways of giving them Ascension Tokens and Eternity Marks.
Character Advancement
Transcendence
Abilities cannot be raised above 5 without a learned Talent of their Type possessing the Transcendence tag.
Training
Maintaining proficiency in all of a character’s various skills as they grow in power and competence tends to result in greater needs in time, support, and complexity of training. Learning a new Talent or Raising an Ability requires a Tier 4 Project of Difficulty equal to the Action Score for the target Group, and Resistance equal to double its Effort Ability. Any known Minor Talents for the Group increase one of these two values for this purpose, either specified in the Talent or at the player’s choice. Each Major Talent instead raises the Tier of the Project required. As normal, if the D/R exceeds 5/10, increase the Tier and reduce by 4/8.

A character may use the new Talent or increased Ability in Scenes before the Project’s completion, but only if they include a valid Progress Goal for the Project in the Scene.

A low Finesse score for a completed Project may result in the character gaining Flaws reflecting a lack of polish, rushed training, or other problems. At high Finesse, the character may gain Assets, or advance progress on a separate Training Project. 
Assets
Assets are transient things the character either possesses or currently has working in their favor, but are spent as they are used, or can be broken or destroyed by hostile action.
Using Assets
Assets provide certain bonuses when used for appropriate attempts. However, they also have a Tier. If the final roll is two or more Tiers lower than the Asset, the roll fails, but the attempt still has Spillover as if it succeeded at the Asset’s Tier, to represent the difficulties and dangers of using a tool beyond the character’s expertise. 

Similarly, if an attempt already has a higher Tier than the item before rolling, the Asset has no effect, as it is too inconsequential to matter. However, if, after rolling and all other bonuses, the Asset is one Tier higher, the attempt instead resolves at the Asset’s Tier.

If more than one Asset of a given type is used, only the highest bonus applies.
Gaining Assets
Conversely to their expendability, they are typically easier to gain in the first place than Talents are. Acquiring a new Asset is generally a Project with D/R equal to its total Bonus and three Tiers higher. Upgrading an existing Asset is easier, being only two Tiers higher than the final Asset’s.

Willing characters may freely trade most Assets between Scenes.
Destroying Assets
Assets are generally easier to destroy than create, though it is also generally easier to protect an Asset with Reactions than it is to interfere with attempts to create them. Destroying an Asset is a Project or Action two Tiers above the Asset’s rating and with D/R equal to its effective bonus. Stealing an Asset is more complicated, and is usually one Tier more difficult than simply destroying it.

However, some Assets, such as Gear, are tangible items that can be Disarmed or otherwise lost from its owning character and recovered by another over the course of a Scene. If the owning character Exits or Escapes the Scene without recovering the Asset, it is permanently lost. Likewise, another character may permanently steal the Asset by Exiting the Scene with it.
Asset Traits
Traits are things about the Asset that provide additional benefits or penalties to their use or affect how easily they can be affected by other characters. These generally have a modifier that increases or reduces the Asset’s effective Bonus when setting the D/R/Tier of both creating and attacking the Asset.
Asset Types
The following are examples of different Assets, their effects, and different traits they may provide.
Access
An Access Asset allows characters to enter a Restricted or Confidential Scene or bypass significant Obstacles without extra effort, and would include tools such as security passes or  keys (genuine or forged), arrangements with smugglers or inside men, or even pre-prepared secret entrances established during an earlier break-in.
Access Traits
By default, Access is Confidential, and as long as any serious attempt at Stealth is made, trying to learn anything about how the character got in or out will require active Investigation. Use of illegitimate Access such as forged or stolen documents or keys is always an Offense.
Overt (- Tier)
Overt Access leaves very obvious traces of entry and will alert any guards to the attempt, such as crashing in directly through a window, or using explosives to enter through a wall. Usually an Offense.
One-Time Use (-Tier)
The entry method, once discovered, is easy to negate and even basic response procedures like changing the locks will prevent it from working twice. The Asset is expended after use unless absolutely no effort is made to investigate.
Alias
An Alias is a constructed, consistent alternate identity that a character may choose to assume when entering Scenes to avoid any Offenses or information being traced back to their real identity. An Alias can have other Assets attached to it, but by doing so they cannot use them “out of character” or risk compromising the alias.

An Alias is often used by criminals, spies, vigilantes, and other people who have good reason to keep their personal and professional lives completely separate, and typically requires some combination of a disguise, a known reputation within a community, forged documents, and strong acting skills to sell that the two identities are entirely different people.
Ally
An Ally Asset is another significant character who is willing to directly assist, but does not have any motivation that would justify them joining the Narrative as a separate PC or Adversary. When adding the Ally, describe why they want to assist the character (duty, favors owed, love, money, etc.), loose details of background, and specialty.
Ally Uses
When entering a Scene, the player may choose to bring any of their Allies with the character, or even in place of the original character. This adds the Ally as a Minion under the player’s control in addition to, or instead of, the character starting the Scene. An Ally cannot be used for this if they are already part of an ongoing Scene, limiting their use in Cutaways or Transitions.

If the Ally takes any SPA damage while present as a Minion, any Projects to eliminate them as an Asset advance at the end of the Scene. If they are defeated during the Scene, they are lost as an Asset. Depending on the tone and events of the story, this may not necessarily mean death; they could simply decide their debts are paid, the job is more than they signed on for, or they’re no longer qualified to help.

Allies themselves are as Overt as they are played in-Scene. However, their affiliation with the character is Confidential, unless they are detected in the same Scene.
Ally Traits
Major Talent (+Tier)
When in play as a Minion, the Ally has a Major Talent chosen at the time of acquisition of this trait.
Minor Talent (+1 D or +2 R)
When in play as a Minion, the Ally has a Minor Talent chosen at the time of acquisition of this trait.
Additional Specialty (+2 D or +4 R)
When in play as a Minion, the Ally has one more Specialty, chosen at the time of acquisition of this trait.
Appearance
An Appearance Asset is some combination of outfit, presentation, and bearing that intends to give onlookers a certain impression of the character, typically for Social purposes. A character might, for example, have a set of fine clothing and jewelry to help pass for a higher class than they really are, or an experienced captain might find they get more business if they play along with stereotypes.

If a character has an Appearance Asset, they typically have to choose whether to use it at the beginning of a Scene, and changing Appearances is usually a Project of two Tiers higher than the Asset. An Appearance is usually an Overt Asset.

Destroying or Disarming an Appearance might be as simple as trashing or stealing the clothes or accessories involved, but others may not be so simple and require changing people’s opinions of them, such as changing fashion trends so it is no longer attractive, convincing society that it’s all an act, or at least that they’re trying too hard to the point where they deserve mockery instead of respect.
Appearance Traits
Camouflage
Camouflage is an outfit designed to blend into a given environment or terrain, providing its benefits to attempts to remain hidden. It only becomes Overt once the character loses Stealth completely.
Nondescript
A Nondescript Appearance hides anything remarkable or identifying about the character, and thus benefits Social rolls to blend into crowds or avoid notice in non-combat Scenes, and acts as armor against investigation from characters that can perceive them, passively Opposing attempts to reveal information about them, except for Talents and Gear currently being used. This is not Overt.
Deceptive
A Deceptive Appearance leads observers to make false assumptions about the character, their status, skills, or life experience. A “professional” craftsman might dress the part while actually knowing very little about their role, or a skilled fighter or manipulator might present as far more naive and innocent than they really are to lead others to underestimate them. The Asset is still Overt, but this nature of it is Confidential, and will only be learned by other characters if they specifically investigate it, or the deception is used against them.

However, if the Asset is used in any Overt Action that is sufficiently public, it will be expended as the reality becomes common knowledge.
Capital
A Capital Asset is something valuable in the financial sense, but typically doesn’t affect the character’s day-to-day life. This can be a large sum of money saved away, deeds to valuable land or property, shares in or ownership of a business, or expensive trade goods they have stored or hidden away. Capital is extremely useful, though mostly in the acquisition of other Assets. 

If Capital can be leveraged to acquire materials, work environment, access, or other benefits toward acquiring another Asset, its bonus applies. Capital can also be expended as part of a Scene Goal to transform it into an equal or lesser Asset of a different type upon successful resolution of the Scene, including as a Flashback or Cutaway Scene.
Capital Traits
Public (-2 Difficulty)
Public Capital is openly known to belong to the character by anyone aware of the character at all.
Hidden (+2 Difficulty)
The existence and location of the Asset is Confidential.
Secured (+4 Resistance)
The Asset and/or any records of ownership are kept in a well-guarded location. The Tier required to destroy or steal it is increased by 1, and the character will immediately discover any unsuccessful or low-Finesse aborted attempts.
Illiquid (-2 Difficulty)
The Asset cannot be sold or leveraged piecemeal, and can only be used by being expended.
Marked (+/- 2 Difficulty, special)
Marked Capital informs a certain character if/when it is being used. If it is being Marked by the owner or creator, this increases the Difficulty of acquiring/modifying it. If it is Marked by a different character opposed to the current owner spending “their” money, this is a negative modifier.

Removing another character’s Mark increases the required Tier of the upgrade Project.
Tracked (+/- Tier, special)
As Marked, but the owning character always knows the location of the Asset, unless covered by a higher-Tier effect.
Connections
Connections represent the character’s standing with organizations or individuals either too loose and nebulous to directly participate in the story, or so powerful that their presence more looms over the Narrative than engages it.
Connection Uses
Restricted Scenes
Most such entities a character might have Connections with will host private events or have private areas they will allow the character to use. Anyone else who wishes to Join or otherwise interfere without the character’s permission will need a relevant Access or Connections Asset of equal or higher bonus, or break in as under Restricted Scenes, above.
Training
While Connections generally aren’t attached enough to the character to be willing to stick their necks out for them, if the character wishes to learn or practice skills within the Connection’s area of expertise, they can typically provide a wealth of knowledge to share.
Asset Acquisition
Similarly, while Connections may not necessarily be willing to offer them for free, they can often provide significant help acquiring other Assets within their specialty.
Forgiving Offenses
Finally, if the character or any allies have committed Offenses against the power represented by the Connection, they may erase the Offense by expending the Asset.
Connection Traits
Connections are generally Confidential. Even if they are used to enter a Scene, the Restricted nature of the Scene will usually only reveal the Connection to other characters present in-Scene.
Illicit
Illicit Connections are criminal rings, foreign spies, and other entities that local authorities are in conflict with, and possessing such Connections is itself an Offense, if proven and exposed. Conversely they are much more willing to assist in Actions and Projects that are already Offenses.
Followers
Followers behave similarly to an Ally, except that a Followers Asset correlates to a larger number of individually less competent Minions.
Follower Uses
Similar to Allies, Followers can be brought into a Scene as a Minion. However, Followers always have the Troop trait, and can always be used, even if they are already present in an ongoing Scene, as the many individual followers can be in multiple places.

However, only if the Scene is Escalated above the Follower group’s Tier do they risk destruction in a Scene as with Allies. The bulk of the Followers will not fit into a smaller Scene, and so even the total destruction of the Minion troop only advances Projects, as with harming an Ally.
Follower Traits
Major Talent (+Tier)
When in play as a Minion, the Follower Troop has a Major Talent chosen at the time of acquisition of this trait.
Minor Talent (+1 D or +2 R)
When in play as a Minion, the Follower Troop has a Minor Talent chosen at the time of acquisition of this trait.
Additional Specialty (+2 D or +4 R)
When in play as a Minion, the Follower Troop has one more Specialty, chosen at the time of acquisition of this trait.
Elites (+X D, +2X R)
The Followers are fewer but more individually competent, gaining a bonus of X/X to their Reactions.
Gear
Gear is a character’s personal equipment, with higher ratings in Gear representing more and better materiel. It is, by definition, almost always man-portable and has to be physically in the Scene in order to be used, making it the most vulnerable to being attacked and/or disarmed and stolen, but also has the greatest variety of possible uses, even if any single piece of Gear may tend to be single-purpose.

When creating or otherwise acquiring a new Gear Asset, describe its form and purpose (ex. Weapon, armor, tool, etc.) to define the circumstances the Asset can be used for. Gear Assets generally either cannot be used without expending them, or gain nothing from being expended, depending on traits chosen.
Gear Traits
Note: Weapons and Armor have additional Traits available listed on page XX for brevity in this section.
Two-Handed (-1 Difficulty)
The item requires both hands to properly use, making it difficult to have more than one piece of Gear on hand.
Concealable (+2 D)
A Concealable item can be stored discreetly on a character’s person when not in use. Until the character draws it out as an Action, the difficulty of identifying or detecting it is increased by 1 Tier, and if it would normally be Overt, that trait is suppressed.
Single-Use (-1 Tier)
A Single-Use item can only be directly used by expending the Asset, such as a grenade or a flare.
Short-Load (-1 D)
A Short-Load item must be reloaded, repaired, or recharged between uses. This is a Miscellaneous Action. Characters may always choose to enter a Scene already loaded.
Long-Load (-2 D)
As Short-Load, but the Action must be 2 Tiers above the Gear’s, or, more likely, a Project. Characters may choose to enter a Scene already loaded, unless chaining directly off from another Scene in which it was not.
Brace of X (+1 D/R per each)
The item is actually a set of identical lesser items, such as a belt of grenades, or a redundant rack of tools, giving the character multiple uses of otherwise Single-Use or Long-Load items, or letting them equip allies with spare copies.
Cache of X (+Tier)
Instead of just the one item, the character instead has a significant supply of them stored away they may access between Scenes, allowing them to consistently access and use Single-Use items in multiple Scenes or equip allies joining the Scene. 

However, they do not have the spare copies on hand if they lose one mid-Scene, and if they supply more than a full Tier-up’s worth of allies (15-20 individuals) they expend the Asset. 
Lifestyle
Lifestyle Assets represent housing, amenities, daily life places they’re accepted regulars at, and so on.
Lifestyle Uses
Private Scenes
Most Lifestyle Assets have a definite, fixed location and some limited measures of security or property rights that limit (safe/legal) access, and can be used for Private Scenes.
Recovery
When Recovering on the Scene track, or working on a Project to Recover on the NPA track, add the Asset’s Bonus to the character’s LCK/WILL to determine how much they Recover. This only applies if the Asset’s Tier equals or exceeds the character’s minimum threshold.
Training
The amenities a character has access to through their Lifestyle can provide bonuses to Training Scenes through access to tools such as libraries, weight equipment, or simply ample opportunity to rest and recover between attempts.
Lifestyle Traits
Safehouse (+2 Difficulty)
The existence and location of the Asset is Confidential.
Defended (+Tier)
If attacked or infiltrated, the Asset is protected by a full encounter of guards of the appropriate Tier, or otherwise requires a Hazardous Project of the appropriate Tier to force entry.

Research
Research consists of specific, focused knowledge that may be relevant to an opponent, Challenge, or Project the character is facing, such as a case study on prior attempts at similar tasks, or specialized training on how a specific type of enemy fights. It is generally Confidential when Research is used, and even the target of an Action benefiting from it might need to actively investigate to realize what is going on.
Research Uses
Research can be used to benefit Actions similarly to the bonuses of a Prepare Action.
Talents
Talents are the capabilities a character has that are more specific or esoteric than skill and abilities represent. Talents are binary, either a character has one or they don’t, but each Talent has five levels of mastery accounting for how easily they are used and how much the drawbacks affect the character.
Learning Talents
Talents are learned through Training Projects, as above under Character Advancement. While following attempts to Progress this Project may simply be attempting to use the Talent in a Scene, initiating the Project typically requires a more defined Goal to find a tutor, acquire relevant training equipment or study materials, and so on.
Permanent Talents
If a character has a Permanent Talent, it is always on, and instead may have a cost to temporarily suppress the Talent and any drawbacks it may have.
Invoked Talents
Most Talents are only active when they are specifically being used. These come in several varieties, depending on the benefits provided, how long the effects last, and in what time scale they are used.
Simple Talents
Simple Talents are on/off; the character either has the bonus or doesn’t, and the costs are fixed. 
Scaling Talents
A Scaling Talent has either a cost in AP, Effort, Plot Armor, or some other currency, or a drawback of variable severity, such as a bonus to future enemy attacks. The power of the Talent increases with increasing cost or severity.
Sustained Talents
A Sustained Talent is a Simple or Scaled Talent that has a continuing effect. A Sustained Talent’s effect continues until the character takes a Reaction to end it or another character successfully Counters it. The character must also pay any cost to invoke the Talent at the start of every subsequent round or its effects end, though this may be done reflexively. 
Narrative Talents
Narrative Talents can only be invoked in the Narrative scope when starting or joining Scenes. They can either be Simple or Scaling, and if they provide a benefit in a Scene when they are invoked, it cannot be canceled and may only be Countered by an Action of Tier higher than the minimum required by the Scene’s Escalation. Narrative Talents are usually harder to train than simply making heavy use of them in Scenes; You don’t get more Wealthy by recklessly spending money, after all.
Talent Descriptions
Personality
All Personality Talents are Permanent, representing intrinsic character traits and flaws and how well the character has them under control.
Impulsive
Benefit:
The character reacts swiftly and without hesitation. Their starting Initiative is equal to half their Luck (rounded up) instead of 0.
Drawback:
Sometimes hesitation is the right choice. The character takes a success penalty equal to the above on all Reactions opposing attempts at stealth, misdirection, disinformation, or similar subtleties, as well as any effect that would give them Surprised.
Cautious
Benefit:
The character is a perpetual planner and is not easily caught unprepared. They gain extra AP equal to their Luck, which can only be spent on Reactions.
Drawback:
Waiting for someone else to act is not conducive to immediate action. The character’s starting Initiative is reduced by half their Luck. This may reduce it below 0.
Compassionate
Benefit:
The character’s empathetic nature makes it easy for them to relate to others. They gain Free Effort equal to half their CHA on Social actions, as long as they aren’t intended to harm the target.
Drawback:
Empathy makes it hard to act against others. The character cannot make Lethal Attacks in a scene. If they somehow accidentally deal such damage (ex. through Hazards) before passing the Gate, they receive this damage too.
Relentless
Benefit:
The character can keep going through punishing circumstances. They do not take success penalties for having too much damage on their PA tracks. They still may not act if any are filled completely.
Penalty:
They do not know when it’s time to quit, and this persistence gets them in trouble. Dramatic Escapes cost them 1 NPA more, and they must pass a Gate of strength equal to their LCK before they can Exit a scene with any Goals remaining unfulfilled.

The character may only suppress this Drawback as an action.
Aggressive
Benefit:
The character always comes out of the gate at full force. They gain extra Effort every round equal to their Luck.
Drawback:
The character Exerts APA equal to half their Luck on every subsequent turn until the end of the Scene. This is cumulative.

Suppressing this Drawback only prevents the current turn from adding on to subsequent turns. Any previous rounds must still be paid for. It cannot be suppressed after the start of the turn.
Ambitious
Benefit:
The character excels most when reaching beyond their station. If the Difficulty for a roll (accounting for penalties) is higher than the Ability they are rolling with, they may convert up to half their Luck in dice to automatic successes.
Drawback:
Their hubris throws them off when their reality does not match their expectations. On failing a roll, they take APA damage equivalent to the margin of failure. If the action was Escalated, this is instead SPA.
Flamboyant 
Benefit:
A flair for the dramatic drives this character and gives them a knack for getting others to go along with them. If their action would force a Dilemma onto another character, the damage for refusing the Dilemma is increased by half their Luck.
Drawback:
There’s the easy way and the flashy way, and unfortunately they rarely intersect. The Difficulty of a roll cannot be lower than half the character’s Luck.
Physical Talents
Physical Talents deal with movement, physical combat, body control, and brute force.
Major Talents
Physical Major Talents upgrade the Tier of Actions using them by 1, and specify what circumstances qualify for their use. As normal with Major Talents, the Tier upgrades stack if more than one qualifies.
Mastery of the Flying Step
The character moves around the scene as if the laws of gravity and motion have not been explained to them as thoroughly as they should have. The way they freely run from floor to wall and back again, flow from one traversal to another, and roll out of falls that should be fatal without a scratch is perhaps not superhuman, but an audience that does not know the tricks might be hard-pressed to believe that.
Benefit:
When on solid ground or near other solid surfaces they can interact with, any Move Action, attempt to Progress around an Obstacle, or other Action involving movement is upgraded one Tier.
Mastery of the Empty Hand
Unburdened by the need for weapons, the character’s fists flicker like lightning and land like thunder.
Benefit:
When making Physical attacks, breaking an Obstacle, or attempting similar feats without any Gear, the roll is upgraded one Tier.
Mastery of the Phantom’s Passage
The character’s footfalls are silent, their form seems to melt into the shadows, and even the noisy things of the world seem to conspire to keep their secrets as creaking doors and stubborn locks seem to become pliant at their touch.
Benefit:
While Undetected or better in Stealth, all of the character’s Physical Actions are upgraded one Tier. They may, as normal, spend this Tier on multitasking to guard against attempts to detect their Action. When Concealed or worse in Stealth, Physical Actions to improve their Stealth are upgraded in Tier.
Mastery of the Steel Skin
Reflexes are honed to take full advantage of armor, knowing when pieces can take what strikes from which angles, and how to defend the weak points and gaps with movements so small they barely seem to be on purpose.
Benefit:
While wearing Tier-appropriate armor, increase the minimum Tier required to damage the character by 1 against Physical Attacks, Hazards, and other similar damage sources. If not wearing Tier-appropriate armor, instead treat the armor’s Tier as 1 higher. (The character must at least be wearing something.)
Minor Talents
Physical Minor Talents give the character tricks they can use in Physical Scenes to give them an advantage in combat, stealth, movement, and other tasks.
Mobile Fighter
The character fights from a more dynamic stance than more conventional warriors, making them quicker on their feet and harder to pin down.
Cost: 1 AP
Benefit:
If the character moves within their own Zone as part of an Action, the movement is not interrupted by a successful Oppose unless the character fails to meet the required Tier to overcome it.

If the character moves between Zones, they may attack a valid target from their new position as part of the Action, using the same roll. If the target did not attempt to engage them during their movement, they may attempt to Oppose this attack. If they did Oppose the movement, reuse the same Reaction.

Note: Because the attack uses the same roll as the Move, Flying Step would upgrade the Attack’s tier as well.
Driving Strike
Scaling
Rather than choose between shoving an enemy back and striking them down, why not simply strike them back?
Cost: 1+ Power
Benefit:
A melee or unarmed Attack may have the following Dilemma attached to it: They may either be moved 1 Move action away, or the Power of the attack is increased by double the Power invested in this Talent.
Hauler
Permanent
This character routinely carries heavy loads, and has adapted to the weight.
Benefit:
If heavy Gear would take Effort to carry, reduce the Effort required by half the character’s STR.
Pack Rat
Narrative, Scaling
This character somehow seems to always have space for more things.
Benefit:
One minor item per point may be declared on hand without counting against the Gear limit.
Wrestler
Scaling
You can hold someone still by muscle alone, but it’s far less tiring simply to make movement have a cost in broken limbs.
Cost: 1+ Power
Benefit:
A melee or unarmed Attack may have the following Dilemma attached to it: They may either advance the severity of their Restrained status (gaining Snared if they are currently unrestrained), or the Power of the attack is increased by double the Power invested in this Talent.
Riposte
Scaling
If an enemy’s blade is at your throat, it is not guarding his own.
Cost: 1+ Successes, 1+ Power
Benefit:
If the Parry attempt succeeds, as part of this same Reaction an Attack may be made against the original attacker. This attack automatically gets Successes and Power equal to the cost paid instead of rolling.
Overpenetrate
Force is only “excessive” if it runs out of targets.
Cost: 1 AP
Benefit:
If an attack defeats a target or would fill one their PA tracks, the remaining Power may instead be redirected towards another target within reach or line-of-fire. This new Attack uses the same roll as the original Attack for the purposes of defending with Reactions.
Quick Draw
Attacking first doesn’t matter as much if you have to bring a fist to a knife fight to do it.
Cost: Free
Benefit:
The character may draw and ready a weapon in the same Action as it is used.
Rapid Reload
Rifleman’s adage: Slow is smooth, smooth is fast.
Cost 1 AP
Benefit:
If any Gear used has the Short-Load trait, ignore it. If it has the Long-Load trait, Progress Actions intended to reload are upgraded 1 Tier.
Ricochet
Scaling
Lining up a shot gets easier if you don’t care how straight the line is.
Cost: 1 Success per bounce.
Benefit:
Thrown weapons such as grenades can be bounced off a convenient surface to reach targets behind walls.
Deadly Dodge
Scaling
Friendly fire can still be enemy action.
Cost: 1+ Successes
Benefit:
If the attempt to Dodge or Evade succeeds, the attack may instead be redirected at another target within reach or line-of-fire. The redirected Attack has successes equal to the cost of this Talent, and retains the original Power.
Quiet Load
Scaled
Strength and subtlety are not necessarily opposed concepts.
Cost: 1+ Effort
Benefit:
If carrying (not using) Gear or similarly interacting with Challenges or other scenery would increase the Difficulty of Stealth rolls, the Difficulty may be reduced by the cost, to a minimum of 1. The cost cannot be greater than DEX.
Drawback:
Cumbersome – The Difficulty of Move or Progress actions vs. difficult terrain cannot be lower than the benefit of this Talent.
Subtle Strike
Scaled
If the victim doesn’t know something happened, how should anyone else?
Cost:1+ Successes
Benefit:
If the cost spent on this Talent is greater than the target’s INT, they do not realize the attack’s success and effects, if possible, until an appropriate time in the scene. The Attack is not inherently Overt, though any Overt/Overt-Use Gear, Talents, or other effects may still make it so. If the attacker was at least Unlocated, they remain so and the target mistakes any contact or pain for something unrelated. Otherwise, the target simply thinks the attack missed.
Mental Talents
Mental Talents deal with knowledge, discovery, schemes, awareness, and how that aptitude affects their place in society.
Major Talents
Mastery of the Unknowing Pawn
Almost as good as a reliable friend, is a predictable enemy.
Cost: 1 AP/Spotlight
Benefit: After another character takes an Action or resolves a Scene Goal that this character knows about, they may cutaway to explain how this new development actually benefits a Project they already have in progress. Apply the Successes/Power or Agency/Impact of the original Action/Scene Goal as a Progress Action/Goal towards the character’s Project. 

If the original character is aware of the Project’s nature, they gain a passive Reaction to explain how they accounted for this trickery.

Note: the explanation does not necessarily have to be out loud, in-universe, but if the character can’t help themselves, a good monologue that accidentally reveals information that makes foiling the plan easier should be rewarded with an Ascension Token.
Mastery of the Opportune Moment
Opportunity knocks every day, but often only the keenest ears hear it.
Cost: 1 Miscellaneous Action of Tier fitting the Scene’s Escalation
Benefit: During a Scene, the character may take an Action to interact with another character’s introduced Goal as the player explains how they are improvising a way to use it for their own ends. During Resolution for the Scene, if completed, the Agency/Power invested in that Goal applies towards both characters’ agendas.
Mastery of the All-Seeing Eye
The secret to perceiving everything is ignoring nothing.
Benefit: When attempting to investigate hidden information or characters in Stealth, Actions and Reactions are upgraded one Tier.
Mastery of the Vanishing Trail
Knowing the shape of one’s footprint is the first step towards erasing it.
Benefit: When targeted by investigate Actions aimed at uncovering secrets or proving Offenses (not breaking Stealth), the minimum Tier required for damage is increased by 1.

Additionally, upgrade the Tier of attempts to Oppose such investigations against an allied character, or destroy/conceal Overt evidence.
Minor Talents
Professional
Scaling
When work and life blur together.
Benefit:
Choose a mundane field of work or study. When making rolls dependent on knowledge in that field, upgrade the roll one Tier.
Artisan
Permanent
It is a show of confidence to make one's own tools, because then there is no one else left to blame.
Benefit:
Choose a craft. When creating or modifying Gear or other Assets in that field of practice, upgrade the Action by 1 Tier.
Blindsense
Scaling, Sustained
Your eyes may deceive you, don’t trust them.
Cost: 1+ Effort
Benefit:
Roll a Guard Action, Opposing attempts to maintain or enter into Stealth. Unlike a normal Guard, this lasts until the Talent ends. Additionally, the character ignores Concealment from terrain.
One More Thing…
The best traps are made from the victim’s own words.
Cost: 1+ Dice
Trigger: When setting a Trap against falsehoods, lies of omission, or other attempts to manipulate the truth during a Social interaction.
Benefit:
If more Dice are paid than the target’s INT, the target does not know that a trap has been set. If the trap is triggered by a statement the character knows the truth of, the trap is Lethal.
Medic
First do no harm.
Trigger: Recovering, or Supporting another character’s Recover Action or Scene after they have taken Physical damage.
Benefit:
The target may substitute either or both of the character’s Mental Abilities in place of their own Endurance Abilities when calculating how much damage they recover, but they may only heal from Physical damage when doing so.
Vital Targeting
Sustained
The importance of knowing where to cut is lost on neither the doctor, nor the assassin.
Trigger: A Prepare Action to set up a Physical Attack against a target.
Cost: 1-LRN Dice
Benefit:
While this stance is maintained, attacks against the target gain Power equal to the cost taken. If the cost paid is greater than the target’s WILL, the Attack may instead be upgraded by a Tier.
Style Deconstruction
Sustained
Everyone’s predictable, just some predictions are more complicated than others.
Trigger: A Scene-level Trap against a specific opponent Physically attacking the character, made by studying and countering their technique.
Cost: 1+ Effort
Benefit:
Each time the target triggers the Trap with an Attack, the character gains the damage dealt as a bonus to their Reactions against those Attacks. 

If the amount of Effort paid is at least half of the target’s INT, the character’s own attacks against the target also trigger this damage.
Cold Reader
Everyone has a life story. All it takes to read it is knowing the language it’s written in.
Trigger: Investigating another character by direct observation or social interaction.
Cost: 1+ Dice
Benefit:
Witnesses, including the target, do not notice the Action, or discover anything about this Talent unless their INT is higher than the cost paid. The target is aware they are in conversation, but may be Unaware of the use of this Talent or that any meaningful information is discovered, mistaking the interaction for small talk.
False Opening
“Too good to be true” can exist in a fight. But not in anyone who lived to see a second one.
Trigger: Action-level Influence forcing the target to attack the character, or an Action-level trap punishing the target for attacking the character.
Cost: +1 Dice
Benefit: if the target attacks the character, they gain a free Reaction as if Guarding, and the Dice spent on this Talent are added to the Reaction as a bonus. Characters seeing this Talent in use do not discover anything about it or recognize its use unless their INT is higher than the cost paid, including the target.
Improviser
Scaling
There’s a classic paradox in art: restrictions liberate the creative soul more than freedom does.
Benefit:
Ignore a number of success penalties from lacking access to quality material or tools when crafting equal to the cost. There must still be at least enough materials and tools.
Drawback:
Fragile – When using equipment made with this Talent, the maximum amount of Effort that may be spent is reduced by the cost.
Woodsman
The fact that a steel spike is sharper does not mean a wooden one hurts less.
Benefit: When in a wilderness area or otherwise having access to a broad array of flora, the character may treat the natural environment as crafting material and workspace for appropriate items. This includes restocking minor items.
Drawback:
Breakable – A failed or successfully opposed attempt to use items produced through this Talent destroys the item.
Social Talents
Social Talents deal with interpersonal interactions, public speaking, and presentation and status within society. 
Major Talents
Mastery of the Thousand Ears
Crowds have a murmur, not a voice. This is why they so often fall for the first one that claims to speak for it.
Trigger: Attempting Social Influence on a large group, debating an Offense before a crowd, or otherwise speaking to the masses.
Benefit:
The character’s gravitas, public appeal, and simple comfort before the massed audience upgrades their rolls by 1 Tier.
Mastery of the Whistling Birds
All rumors start somewhere, but only the most dangerous ones seem to start everywhere.
Trigger: Attempting to covertly take a Social Action.
Cost: Affected Action is on a Round-Delay
Benefit:
By understanding the flow of gossip through a Social Scene, the character can feed truths and lies into the rumor mill far enough upstream that their fingerprints upon them will all but wash away by the time they reach their targets. If the affected Social action would normally be Overt, it isn’t, and the minimum Tier for Investigate attempts to discover the character using their action as a clue is upgraded by 1.
Mastery of the Manifold Mask
The first step towards gaining a new face, is fully understanding your original one.
Trigger: Being in or entering Stealth via disguise, wearing an Alias, attempting to establish one, or similar Actions.
Benefit: Actions taken to pass off as a different character are upgraded in Tier. If being Investigated to discover the character’s identity or other information hidden by the disguise, the minimum Tier is upgraded by 1.
Minor Talents
Poet
Scaling
Language is art, and all the boundaries in the world cannot separate art from the soul.
Trigger: Any Influence roll relying on emotion or the Intimacies or past experience of the target.
Cost: 1+ Dice or Power
Benefit:
When attempting to inspire or otherwise call upon the emotions of the target, mastery of wit, subtext, wordplay, and structure let the character communicate many words with only a few, slip a message past censors, and avoid other such problems in relaying the message. Characters other than the target with lower INT or LRN than the cost paid in Dice or Power (respectively) do not realize the Action is being taken, and cannot Oppose it.
Deceptive Skill
The amateur’s mistake is the professional’s con.
Trigger:  Action-level trap punishing the target for attacking the character.
Cost: +1 Dice
Benefit: Characters seeing this Talent in use do not discover anything about it or recognize its use unless their INT is higher than the cost paid, including the target. If the target does not recognize the Talent as above, the Trap itself is also secret, as is the Action that will trigger it. They instead mistake the Trap for some other Action taken, such as a Guard or a missed Attack.
Enraging Provocations
Emotion is volatile, put too much in one person and eventually they explode.
Trigger: Inducing a target to Attack or otherwise take hostile action against the character or a third party.
Cost: 1 Effort
Benefit: If the target declines to follow the Influence and instead takes the damage, the Dilemma is modified. If on a subsequent Influence towards the same Action they give in, they also take a 1-Success penalty on that Attack(s), but gain +1 Power. This is cumulative if multiple Influences are used.
Councilor
Mental scars are just like physical ones, except it’s easier to pretend you don’t have them.
Trigger: Recovering, or Supporting another character’s Recover Action or Scene after they have taken Influence damage.
Benefit:
The target may substitute either or both of the character’s Social Abilities in place of their own Endurance Abilities when calculating how much damage they recover, but they may only heal damage from Influence when doing so.
Doubletalk
A mismatch between the cleverness of tongues and the cleverness of ears allows for many interpretations of the same phrase.
Cost:1+ Successes
Benefit:
If the cost spent on this Talent is greater than the target’s INT, they do not realize any Influence took place, until an appropriate time in the scene. 
Gear
Gear, as an Asset, is the assorted weapons, tools, armor, and other items the characters bring with them when they rush into the Scene. This continues the section on “Gear” in the Assets chapter, above.
Tools
Tools are aides for non-combat Actions.
General Tools
General tools aren’t made or acquired with a specific purpose in mind, or have major components that are easily adapted to other needs, such as the ropes, hooks, and harnesses of a climbing set. General Tools have no special bonuses from type, but any Dice, Power, or Tier bonuses may be applied to more Actions.
Specialized Tools
Specialized tools are designed to do one specific thing very well, and are often rather useless outside of them, such as a set of lockpicks. The narrow focus means Specialized Tools grant an inherent Tier upgrade to Actions matching their use case. Even if a reasonable use case is found outside of this niche (ex. Using a lockpick to fish out something stuck in a small crevice) the bonus does not apply.
Weapons
Weapons are combat tools wielded and used for Attacks, Parries, supporting such Actions, or similar. 
Nonlethal Weapons
Nonlethal Weapons are ones that focus on controlling the target over simply killing them or beating them into submission or retreat. When acquiring the weapon, choose a condition group that can be imposed by a dilemma, such as Balance, Restraint, or Readiness. When the weapon is used for Attacks imposing that Condition, the damage threatening it is upgraded as if Lethal, and the second-degree Condition is imposed instead of the first-degree.
Lethal Weapons
Blades, spikes, heavy smashing weapons, and most projectile weapons are designed to kill or incapacitate the target, and such weapons provide Lethal if used to Attack or Support an Attack.
Shields
While a shield can be used for offense, their designed purpose is defensive. When used to Guard or Parry Attacks, upgrade the Action’s Tier. 
Armor
Armor is protective gear meant to prevent Attacks from harming the character. Armor cannot be used to Attack, but can be used to Parry or Guard, and grants automatic Passive Parries on all valid Attacks.
Vehicles
Vehicles have Bonuses similar to any other variety of Gear, but they function differently. When taking a Vehicle Action, the character treats the Bonus of the vehicle as the Primary Ability, and picks the Supporting Ability group as normal. However, any Action using a Vehicle is upgraded in Tier.

More so than most other Gear, large and higher-Tier vehicles in particular are prone to requiring Projects to be controlled by individual characters, or to allow a crew to operate in coordination.
Minions
Minions are the character’s hirelings, connections, summons, drones, or other independent helpers. These usually come from Scenes or beginning-of-Scene rolls and Actions, but may be manifested in the middle of a Scene through the use of Gear, Ascended Abilities, or other such effects as Escalated Complicate or Prepare Actions. If an Action creates a Minion, it must be Escalated at least once. Minions typically have three attributes: Dice, Power, and a Specialty. They may also have a number of Bonuses.

Unless otherwise noted, a Minion created by an Action disappears at the end of the Scene. However, Assets or Talents may include or be represented by Minions, and these Minions will persist on the next occasion that Asset is involved in a Scene. Losing such a Minion during a Scene may Progress a Project to destroy the Asset, destroy it completely (particularly in the case of Allies) or be considered an Attack by proxy against its creator.
Type
A Minion must have only one Type.
Individual
An Individual Minion acts much like a full character, only with more streamlined stats and rules.
Troop
A Minion Troop is composed of numerous individuals of similar ability and training and capable of accomplishing more than their normal limits through teamwork. However, when challenged in smaller groups or when subjected to wide-area Attacks and Hazards, those limits tend to reveal themselves.

Troops use their normal Dice/Power rating only when taking Actions. When Reacting, individuals act on their own, having reduced values depending on the troops’s Size, below. Additionally, Troops suffer more from area attacks. Attacks that strike all Engaged targets gain +2 Power, while any effect that would target the entire Zone is upgraded in Tier.

Additionally, Troops can subdivide, sending out individuals or small groups from their bulk to perform tasks such as Attacking isolated enemies, or guarding an area against infiltration. Doing this costs PA, which cannot be Recovered until the dispatched group returns. The dispatched group has the PA spent as its own PA track, and any remaining PA the group has is immediately added to main Troop’s upon their return.
Size
A Troop has an additional property that individual Minions lack, Size. Size represents how many individuals form the Troop, and inversely how large the gap in capability is between each individual and the Troop as a whole. A Troop cannot have a Size greater than its Tier.
 Size 0
A Size 0 Troop is less than a dozen members, and each one is a significant component. If the Troop as a whole is better than 2/2, each individual functions as a 2/2 Minion of the same Tier. Otherwise, they are 1/1/ Minions. A 1/1 Troop cannot be Size 0.

 Dispatching a Minion from a Size 0 Troop always costs at least 1 SPA.
Size 1
A Size 1 Troop consists of up to 100 individuals, each individual is a 2/2 Minion one Tier below the Troop as a whole.

A Size 1 Troop can dispatch a Size 0 sub-troop by paying SPA in the same manner as a Size 0 Troop dispatches individuals, above, and can dispatch individuals by paying APA. 
Size 2+
For each increase in Size above 1, raise the number of individuals represented by an order of magnitude. Each individual is a 2/2 Minion that many Tiers below that of the Troop. 

The Troop may dispatch a sub-troop one Tier lesser than itself by paying SPA as above, or two Tiers lower by paying APA. Dispatches of smaller groups than this are too small to have any mechanically-viable cost. 
Movement
If a Troop is smaller than the Scene’s level of Escalation, it acts as normal for characters with regard to Zones and movement.

If a Troop’s Size is the same as the level of Escalation, it completely fills the Zone it occupies, engaging all other characters it has and any relevant terrain features such as Choke Points and Hazards. Only one Troop may occupy the same Zone.

If the Troop’s Size is one level greater than the Scene’s Escalation, it instead completely fills a number of Zones equal to the lesser of its Dice or Power. If a single effect would hit multiple Zones it occupies, treat each additional Zone as another hit.

A Troop cannot be brought into a Scene if it is more than one Size larger than the Scene’s level of Escalation, but it may dispatch a sub-Troop to do so.
Dice
A Minion’s Dice rating is how many dice they roll on any Action or Reaction involving their Specialty. Assuming their Specialty is relevant to the Scene they’re in, it is also the number of AP they get per round. The amount of extra Dice or AP they can get by spending Power or PA is also this number, doubling the total.
Power
A Minion’s Power rating is how much Power they gain on any Action or Reaction involving their Specialty. Assuming their Specialty is relevant to the Scene they’re in, it is also the amount of Effort they get per round. The amount of extra Effort they can get by spending PA is also this number, doubling the total. Likewise, their soft cap for total Power is double this number.
Plot Armor
A Minion has PA equal to is Dice + Power ratings, with recovery and penalties calculated similarly as full character do with LCK and WILL. However, Minions do not have a Narrative track, and are defeated when their SPA is exhausted or if they take Narrative-level damage from any source.
Specialty
A Minion has at least one Specialty by default. They are only at full effect when working in this Specialty. When working outside this Specialty, reduce their Dice and Power ratings by 1 for each degree of separation from the most relevant Specialty, to a minimum of a full Tier below their original rating.
Bonuses
Bonuses are additional effects Minions may have, often representing Gear, Talents, or other distinctions.
Conditions
Conditions are status effects that give characters penalties or bonuses to certain rolls, restrict Actions, or threaten immediate consequences for taking or not taking certain Actions or Reactions. 

All Conditions have three stages of increasing severity, which are cumulative, i.e. a character at Stage 3 still also suffers the effects of stages 1 and 2. These stages must be removed in descending order, so any triggers for removing stages 1 and 2 will not be considered until Stage 3 has been lifted.

If a character is under more than one effect that would give them the same Condition, they instead gain the next stage higher. Characters may opt to voluntarily take many Conditions, such as going Prone to make enemy ranged attacks harder.
Balance
Off-Balance
The character takes a -1 Success penalty to any Physical rolls.
This is removed automatically at the start of their next Action.
Prone
When making rolls for which a low profile is beneficial (hiding, avoiding fire, etc.), buying Successes costs 1 less Power.

All other Physical rolls cost 1 more Power per Success, and movement is always treated as Difficult Terrain.

Switching between Prone and Standing takes a Miscellaneous Action.
Tumbled
The character is not merely lying down, they need a moment to figure out which way is up. The only Physical Action they can take is a Miscellaneous Action to sort themselves back out to Prone, and any Reactions must be Escalated to include this Action as an extra effect.

A character may drop to Tumbled as a free part of a Reaction to gain the benefits of Prone. If they do so, the above penalty does not apply to the current Reaction.
Protection
The Protection conditions are relevant between a given attacker and defender; a target may have Cover from one attacker but not another attacking from a different direction.
Concealed
Light cover, smoke, fog, darkness, or other effects obscure the character from other targets. They may attempt to hide, and when Opposing Physical Attacks or other Actions for which visibility or line-of-sight are relevant, buying Successes costs 1 less Power.

Concealment is usually an effect of environmental attributes such as Hazards or Obstacles, but may be created with Gear or Talents, usually as a Complicate Action. Environmental cover is usually two-way, meaning the attacker also has cover from the character. 

An attacker may overcome Concealment by moving closer, flanking around the side, or destroying whatever Hazard or Challenge is providing it.
Covered
The character is separated from an attacker by a barrier that can stand up to the weapons currently in play. Direct Physical Attacks deal damage to the next lower PA track than normal, unless an Escalation is used to counter this. Area Attacks and the miss effect of Splash Attacks are unaffected.

Cover is usually acquired and removed in the same manner as Concealment.
Entrenched
The character is fortified in place such that they have cover from nearly every direction. The above exception for Splash and Area Attacks is removed, unless the Attack succeeds in targeting them or their cover directly.

Entrenched characters generally cannot Move without leaving their fortifications.
Readiness
Readiness applies to a specific piece of Gear, indicating some issue preventing them from using that item.
Open
An Open character cannot use the affected Item for Reactions until their next Action. This effect ends at that time.
Unready
Unready means the item is sheathed, holstered, unloaded, restrained, or otherwise cannot be used.The only Action that may be taken using the item is to Ready it as a Miscellaneous or Progress Action. 
Disarmed
The item is out of hand and out of reach. The character cannot use it until it is recovered and if the character leaves the Scene without doing so it is lost permanently.

A Disarmed item can be picked up as an Action either by the original user or another character in the Scene.
Stealth
Stealth generally applies to a character against all opposing characters in the Scene, though in cases where there are multiple factions or communications issues, it is possible for a character to be undetected by some enemies but not others.

All Stealth Conditions degrade whenever the character fails an Action, and may downgrade or be removed entirely regardless of success if the character takes Actions wholly without regard for stealth, such as starting a public firefight or setting up heavy weapons in plain sight.
Unseen
Opposing characters don’t know precisely where the character is, but they have a good enough idea of the area to interfere in what they are doing. An Escalation must be used to make direct Attacks against the character, but Splash or Area Attacks work as normal.

Characters may always choose to be Unseen when joining a Scene, narrative permitting, and becoming Unseen is a Miscellaneous or Move Action that may be made with the aid of Concealment or other effects to break sight or other detection methods.
Undetected
Opposing characters are aware of something being present, but do not know the location or nature of the threat. They cannot make direct Attacks on the character at all, and must spend an Escalation to target them with Area or Splash Attacks.

A character may choose to join a Scene Undetected unless they are directly Chaining off of another Scene which they Exited or Escaped without any Stealth. They may gain Undetected over the course of a Scene as a Complicate Action to create an Obstacle. This Condition downgrades if this Obstacle is overcome.
Unknown
Opposing characters are completely unaware that there is any direct threat. This does not mean that ex. Guards are not on duty, but they will not take Actions that are out of routine. Additionally, while they may still React to the character’s Actions, the character may ignore any increase in Difficulty in exchange for downgrading this Condition.

Characters may only join a Scene Unknown if they never fully lost Stealth in any previous Scenes in a Chain. Without special powers or circumstances, characters cannot gain Unknown in the middle of a Scene; instead, reacquiring Unknown requires a Narrative Scope Complicate Goal.
Restrained
Restrained is usually a Condition imposed as a failure condition or threat for Obstacles or Crises, ex. Tangled in a web or mired in mud, an Obstacle that must be overcome, ex. Handcuffs, or a condition imposed by a Dilemma, ex. Grappling. 

In the case of Grappling, breaking free and downgrading this Condition is a Miscellaneous Action.
Snared
The character cannot take Move Actions or Progress Actions against difficult terrain, unless they can bring the source of the Condition with them, either as a contested roll or as an Obstacle.
Confined
When making any Physical rolls except to escape confinement, the character does not get any free dice. The maximum amount of dice they can buy with Power is unchanged.

When grappling, a character cannot impose this Condition on another without themselves becoming Snared.
Pinned
Making any Physical rolls other than to escape the pin must spend an Escalation to succeed.

When grappling, a character cannot impose this Condition on another without themselves becoming Confined.
